CIK: 856982
Company Name: MERIT MEDICAL SYSTEMS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2022-03-01
Accession Number: 0000856982-22-000013


Item 1 Business. Our Company Merit Medical Systems, Inc. is a leading manufacturer and marketer of proprietary medical devices used in interventional, diagnostic and therapeutic procedures, particularly in cardiology, radiology, oncology, critical care and endoscopy. We strive to be the most customer focused company in healthcare. Each day we are determined to make a difference by understanding our customers needs and innovating and delivering a diverse range of products that improve the lives of people and communities throughout the world. We believe that long term value is created for our customers, employees, shareholders, and communities when we focus outward and are determined to deliver an exceptional customer experience. Merit Medical Systems, Inc. was founded in 1987 by Fred P. Lampropoulos, Kent W. Stanger, Darla Gill and William Padilla. Initially we focused our operations on injection and insert molding of plastics. Our first product was a specialized control syringe used to inject contrast solution into a patient arteries for a diagnostic cardiac procedure called an 1 Table of Contents angiogram. Since that time, our products and product lines have expanded substantially, both through internal research and development projects and through strategic acquisitions. Business Strategy Our business strategy focuses on five target areas as follows enhancing global growth and profitability through research and development, sales model optimization, cost discipline and operational focus; optimizing our operational capability through lean processes, cost effective environments and asset utilization; targeting high growth, high return opportunities by understanding, innovating and delivering in our core divisions; maintaining a highly disciplined, customer focused enterprise guided by strong core values to globally address unmet or underserved healthcare needs; and creating sustainability of our business for our employees, shareholders and community. We conduct our operations through a number of domestic and foreign subsidiaries and representative offices. Our principal offices are located at 1600 West Merit Parkway, South Jordan, Utah, 84095, and our teleph1 number is (801) 253 1600. We maintain an internet website at www.merit.com. COVID 19 Pandemic During the last 2 years, the COVID 19 pandemic has had an unsteady but significant impact on our business, suppliers, customers, employees, families and communities. Measures designed to contain the virus, including travel bans and restrictions, border closures, quarantines, shelter in place orders, business limitations and shutdowns continued through the year. In addition, we continued to execute, and enhance, protocols to promote the safety of our employees in the workplace while producing essential medical products. In efforts to contain the spread of the virus, many of our hospital customers prioritized their efforts on their COVID 19 response, diverting their focus and resources away from their normal operations and restricting access to their sites. In 2021, these restrictions were generally reduced, and we were able to achieve the highest annual revenue in the history of the Company. However, lingering effects continue, including unpredictable freight and other logistical expenses and obstacles, and the responses of government authorities and our customers vary from region to region. Please refer to the discussion of the risks and uncertainties associated with the COVID 19 pandemic under the heading The COVID 19 pandemic has negatively impacted our business and operations around the world and may continue to materially and adversely impact our business, operations and financial results . set forth below in Item 1A Risk Factors. Products We design, develop, market and manufacture, through our own operations and contract manufacturers, medical products that offer a high level of quality, value and safety to our customers, as well as the patients they serve. Our products are used in the following clinical areas radiology; diagnostic and interventional cardiology; interventional radiology; neurointerventional radiology; vascular, general and thoracic surgery; electrophysiology; cardiac rhythm management; interventional pulmonology; interventional nephrology; orthopedic spine surgery; interventional oncology; pain management; breast cancer surgery, outpatient access centers; intensive care; computed tomography; ultrasound; and interventional gastroenterology. The success of our products is enhanced by the extensive experience of our management team in the healthcare industry, our experienced direct sales force and distributors, our ability to provide custom procedural solutions such as kits, trays 2 Table of Contents and procedural packs at the request of our customers, and our dedication to offering facility unique solutions in the markets we serve worldwide. We conduct our business through 2 operating segments cardiovascular (which includes peripheral intervention, cardiac intervention, custom procedural solutions, and original equipment manufacturer ( OEM )) and endoscopy. For information relating to our operating segments and product categories, see Note 13 to our consolidated financial statements set forth in Item 8 of this report and Management Discussion and Analysis set forth in Item 7 of this report. The following sections describe our principal product offerings by reporting segment and product category. Cardiovascular We offer a broad line of medical devices used to gain and maintain vascular access. These products include our micropuncture kits, angiographic needles, our family of Prelude sheath introducers and a wide range of guide wires and safety products. Our cardiovascular segment includes the following product categories peripheral intervention, cardiac intervention, custom procedural solutions, and OEM. Peripheral Intervention Our peripheral intervention products support the minimally invasive diagnosis and treatment of diseases in peripheral vessels and organs throughout the body, excluding the heart. Products in our peripheral intervention product category are organized into the following product groups peripheral intervention, spine, and oncology. Merit Vascular Peripheral Our peripheral intervention products include product offerings in the following product portfolios access (peripheral), angiography, drainage, delivery systems, embolotherapy, and intervention (peripheral). The principal product offerings in our access (peripheral) portfolio include our HeRO (Hemodialysis Reliable Outflow) Graft, a fully subcutaneous vascular access system, which is intended for use in maintaining long term vascular access for chronic hemodialysis patients; CentrosFLO Long Term Hemodialysis Catheter and ProGuide Chronic Dialysis Catheter; Broad offering of perit1al dialysis catheters, accessories and implantation kits for home dialysis therapy; Surfacer Inside Out Access Catheter System, an innovative approach to restore access and to preserve treatment options for hemodialysis patients with occluded veins, sold through our distribution agreement with Bluegrass Vascular Technologies, Inc. ( Bluegrass Vascular ); and Merit Wrapsody Endoprosthesis, a cell impermeable endoprosthesis which is designed to maintain long term vessel patency in patients with obstructions in the dialysis outflow circuit (this device is not currently available for use in the United States). The products in our angiography portfolio are used to identify blockages and other disease states in the blood vessel. The principal product offerings in our angiography portfolio include our Extensive line of Merit Laureate Hydrophilic Guide Wires, a smooth surface guide wire designed to minimize friction and promote rapid catheter exchanges; Our newest offering of Merit SplashWire hydrophilic Steerable Guide Wires, combining optimum lubricity, exceptional torque response and enhanced visibility; Performa and Impress Diagnostic Catheters, a catheter offering designed for traversing difficult to access peripheral blood vessels; and Performa Vessel Sizing Catheters for vessel measurement. 3 Table of Contents We offer a broad line of drainage products. The principal product offerings in our drainage portfolio include our Aspira Pleural Effusion Drainage and Aspira Perit1al Drainage Systems, a compassionate treatment option for end stage cancer, allowing patients to spend more time at home by reducing the need for frequent hospital visits to treat their drainage needs; Family of ReSolve Drainage Catheters, including our ReSolve ConvertX Stent System and ReSolve Mini Locking Drainage Catheter, and our related tubing sets and drainage bag; 1 Step and Valved 1 Step Drainage Catheters, sold individually and in kits, for quickly removing unwanted fluid accumulation; and Revolution Catheter Securement Device and StayFIX Fixation Device, used to stop migration, movement and accidental removal of percutaneous catheters. The principal product offerings in our delivery systems portfolio include our SwiftNINJA Steerable Microcatheter, an advanced microcatheter with a 180 degree articulating tip, sold through our exclusive worldwide distribution agreement (excluding Japan) with SB Kawasumi Laboratories, Inc.; Merit Maestro and Merit Pursue Microcatheters, small microcatheters designed for pushability and trackability through small and tortuous vessels; and True Form Reshapable Guide Wire, designed to be reshaped multiple times, reducing the need for multiple guide wires. Our embolotherapy products treat disease by blocking or slowing the flow of blood into the arteries or delivering chemotherapy drugs in the treatment of primary and metastatic liver cancer. The principal product offerings in our embolotherapy portfolio include our Embosphere Microspheres, a highly studied, round embolic for consistent and predictable results; and HepaSphere Microspheres, soft embolics with a consistent cross sectional diameter for predictable, flow directed targeting. The products in our intervention (peripheral) portfolio are chiefly used to remove blood clots, retrieve foreign bodies in blood vessels and assist with placing balloons and stents to treat arterial disease. The principal product offerings in our intervention (peripheral) portfolio include our ClariVein Specialty Infusion Catheter which is designed for controlled 360 degree dispersion of physician specified agents to the peripheral vasculature; Dynamis AV PTA Dilatation Catheter, a line of balloon catheters that facilitates the opening of blockages located in the arteriovenous system of dialysis patients; Q50X , Q50 and Q50 Plus Stent Graft Balloon Catheters, a line of catheters that treat abdominal and thoracic endovascular aortic repair procedures and reinterventions; Fountain Infusion System and Mistique Infusion Catheters, a line of catheters that treat arterial and hemodialysis graft occlusions and deep vein thrombosis; and EN Snare and 1 Snare Endovascular Snare Systems, a complete line of snares designed to manipulate, capture and retrieve foreign material in the body. Merit Spine Our spine products are used in the treatment of vertebral compression fractures and metastatic spinal tumors and in musculoskeletal biopsy procedures. Our spine product line includes the following product portfolios vertebral 4 Table of Contents augmentation, radiofrequency ablation, and b1 biopsy systems. Our primary product offerings in the vertebral augmentation and radiofrequency ablation portfolios include our STAR Tumor Ablation System, designed to provide palliative treatment of painful metastatic spinal tumors in cancer patients by targeted radiofrequency ablation; Arcadia Steerable and straight balloons, designed to achieve controlled, precise, targeted cavity creation in vertebral augmentation procedures; and StabiliT MX Vertebral Augmentation System, which uses our inflation devices to deliver b1 cement. The b1 biopsy systems portfolio contains a full offering of manual b1 biopsy products, including our Madison , Huntington , Kensington , Preston and Westbrook biopsy products. Merit Oncology Our oncology products are dedicated to the accurate diagnosis and localization of breast and soft tissue tumors and the innovative treatment of early stage breast cancer. We also offer an extensive line of soft tissue biopsy products and accessories. Our primary product offerings in our oncology portfolio include our SCOUT Radar Localization System, a nonradioactive, wire free tumor localization system that facilitates successful surgical removal of marked lesions and lymph nodes, improving workflow and the patient experience; CorVocet Biopsy System, 1 of our innovative soft tissue core needle biopsy and accessory products, designed to cut a full core of tissue and provide large specimens for pathological examination; Achieve , Temno and Tru Cut Soft Tissue Biopsy Devices; and SAVI Brachytherapy, a precise, targeted approach to accelerated partial breast irradiation with lower toxicities and reduced treatment duration. Cardiac Intervention We manufacture and sell a variety of products designed to treat various heart conditions. Products in our cardiac intervention product category are organized into the following product portfolios access (cardiac), angiography, electrophysiology and CRM, fluid management, hemodynamic monitoring, hemostasis, and intervention (cardiac). Merit Vascular Cardiac The principal product offerings in our access portfolio (cardiac) include our family of Prelude Introducer Sheaths, for both radial and femoral access, featuring our Prelude IDeal Hydrophilic Sheath Introducer, an ultra thin wall introducer sheath that provides more room for the insertion of catheters and other devices in the radial artery. The principal product offerings in our angiography portfolio include our InQwire Guide Wires and Performa Diagnostic and Ultimate catheters for femoral and radial procedures. Electrophysiology is the study of diagnosing and treating abnormal electrical activities of the heart. Cardiac rhythm management ( CRM ) is the field of cardiac disease therapy that relates to the diagnosis and treatment of cardiac arrhythmias or the improper beating of the heart. The principal product offerings in our electrophysiology and CRM portfolio include our Worley Advanced LV Delivery System, used to aid in the insertion and implantation of left ventricular pacing leads; HeartSpan Transseptal Needle, for left heart access procedures; and HeartSpan Steerable and Fixed Curve Sheath Introducer, featuring a neutral position indicator and tactile click to help physicians identify curve orientation with an expanded product line that includes fixed curve shapes. 5 Table of Contents The product offerings in our fluid management portfolio include manifolds, control syringes and tubing. The principal product offerings in our hemostasis portfolio include our Prelude SYNC EVO and PreludeSYNC Distal Radial Compression devices, designed to reduce and stop blood flow after radial access procedures, and the SafeGuard Pressure Assisted Device which provides hemostasis after femoral procedures. The principal product offerings in our intervention (cardiac) portfolio include a full line of inflation devices and hemostasis valves, including the BasixCompak , basixTOUCH , Blue Diamond and DiamondTouch inflation devices and the PhD Hemostasis Valve, the latest addition to our hemostasis valve portfolio. Custom Procedural Solutions Our custom procedural solutions product category is comprised of standard and custom kit and pack solutions that include Item needed for peripheral procedures, safety and waste management products, and hemostasis accessories. Our kit and pack solutions can optimize efficiency and reduce cost and waste. The principal product offerings in this product category include Critical care products; Dual Cap Disinfection Protection System and Medallion syringes; Manifold Kits; and Trays and Packs. The Cultura swab and collection system (including vials with viral transport media) was introduced in May 2020 in response to the COVID 19 pandemic. Demand for and revenue from the Cultura swab appear to have peaked in 2020. Because this product was introduced to address demand for swabs used to test for COVID 19 and that demand has now significantly decreased, we have seen a significant drop in sales of this product and are no longer actively promoting it. OEM We provide coating services for medical tubes and wires under OEM brands in addition to many of the products identified above. We offer coated tubes and wires to customers on a spool or as further manufactured comp1nts including guide wire comp1nts, coated mandrels stylets and coated needles. We also manufacture and sell sensor comp1nts for microelectromechanical systems. These comp1nts consist of piezoresistive pressure sensors in various forms, including bare silicon die, die mounted on ceramic substrates, and fully calibrated comp1nts for numerous applications both inside and outside the healthcare industry. Endoscopy The products in our endoscopy operating segment, Merit Endotek , are organized in 2 product portfolios gastroenterology and pulmonary. Our gastroenterology products include a complete range of innovative, gastrointestinal solutions. Our primary product offerings in our gastroenterology portfolio include our Alimaxx ES and EndoMAXX Fully Covered Esophageal Stents, for maintaining esophageal luminal patency in certain esophageal strictures; BIG60 Inflation Device, a 60 mL syringe and gauge designed to inflate and deflate non vascular balloon dilators while monitoring and displaying inflation pressures up to 12 atmospheres; and Elation Fixed Wire, Wire Guided and new 5 stage Balloon Dilators, intended for use in the alimentary tract. 6 Table of Contents Our pulmonary products consist of laser cut tracheobronchial stents, advanced over the wire and direct visualization delivery systems and dilation balloons to endoscopically dilate strictures. Our primary product offerings in our pulmonary portfolio include our AERO , AEROmini and AERO DV Fully Covered Tracheobronchial Stents, for the treatment of tracheobronchial strictures produced by malignant neoplasms; and Elation Pulmonary Balloon Dilator, for the dilation of strictures of the trachea and bronchi. We also offer a variety of kits and accessories for endoscopy and bronchoscopy procedures. Marketing and Sales Target Market Industry. Our principal target markets are peripheral intervention, cardiac intervention, interventional oncology, critical care and endoscopy. Within these markets our products are used in the following clinical areas diagnostic and interventional cardiology; interventional radiology; neurointerventional radiology; vascular, general and thoracic surgery; electrophysiology; cardiac rhythm management; interventional pulmonology; interventional nephrology; orthopedic spine surgery; interventional oncology; pain management; breast cancer surgery; outpatient access centers; intensive care; computed tomography; ultrasound; and interventional gastroenterology. According to statistics published by the National Center for Health Statistics, cardiovascular disease continues to be a leading cause of death and a significant health problem in the U.S. Treatment options range from dietary changes to surgery, depending on the nature of the specific disease or disorder. Endovascular techniques, including angioplasty, stenting and endoluminal stent grafts, continue to represent important therapeutic options for the treatment of vascular disease. Breast cancer is the most commonly diagnosed cancer in women and is the second leading cause of cancer death among women. We derive a large percentage of our revenues from sales of products used during percutaneous diagnostic and interventional procedures such as angiography, angioplasty and stent placement, and we intend to pursue additional sales growth by building on our existing market position in both core technology and accessory products. Marketing Strategy. Traditionally, as part of our product sales and marketing efforts, we attend major medical conventions throughout the world pertaining to our target markets and invest in market development including physician training, peer to peer education, and patient outreach. Due to the various restrictions imposed in response to the COVID 19 pandemic, during 2020 and 2021 most medical conventions in which we have participated were virtual meetings. Additionally, we work closely with major healthcare facilities and physicians involving our primary target markets in the areas of training, therapy awareness programs, clinical studies and ongoing product research and development. In general, our target markets are characterized by rapid change resulting from technological advances and scientific discoveries. We plan to continue to develop and launch innovative products to support clinical trends and to address the increasing demands of these markets. Product Development Strategy. Our product development is focused on identifying and introducing a regular flow of profitable products that meet customer needs. To stay abreast of customer needs, we frequently seek suggestions from health care professionals working in the fields of medicine in which we offer or develop products. Suggestions for new products and product improvements may also come from engineers, marketing and sales personnel, physicians and technicians who perform clinical procedures. When we believe that a product suggestion demonstrates a sustainable competitive advantage, meets customer needs, fits strategically and technologically with our business and has a good potential financial return, we generally assemble a project team comprised of individuals from our sales, marketing, engineering, manufacturing, legal and quality assurance departments. This team works to identify the customer requirements, integrate the design, compile necessary documentation and testing, and prepare the product for market introduction. We believe that 1 of our competitive strengths is our capacity to conceive, design, develop and introduce new products. 7 Table of Contents U.S. and International Sales. Sales of our products in the U.S. accounted for 57%, 57% and 58% of our net sales for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively. In the U.S., we have a dedicated, direct sales organization primarily focused on selling to end user physicians, hospitals and alternate site facilities (e.g., office based labs), major buying groups and integrated healthcare ne2rks. Internationally, we employ sales representatives and contract with independent dealer organizations and custom procedure tray manufacturers to distribute our products worldwide, including territories in Europe, the Middle East, Africa, Asia, Oceania, Central and South America, Mexico and Canada. In 2021, our international sales grew 126% over our 2020 international sales and accounted for 43% of our net sales. Our largest non U.S. market is China, which represented 13% of our net sales in 2021 and reported net sales of $138.2 million, $1132 million, and $1133 million for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively. We maintain a distribution center and administrative office in Beijing. We also have small sales offices in Shanghai, Guangzhou, and Hong Kong. We sell our products through more than 500 distributors in mainland China, who are responsible for reselling our products, primarily to hospitals. We use the modified direct sales approach in China, employing sales personnel throughout China who work with our distributors to promote the clinical advantages of our products to clinicians and other decision makers at hospitals. Beginning in 2020, we experienced a significant disruption of our business throughout the world as a result of the COVID 19 pandemic, and t his disruption continued through 2021 We are unable to calculate the full impact of the COVID 19 pandemic on our business, and we are unable to predict whether we will continue to be affected by it, but we have seen a material adverse impact on our global operations and financial condition, primarily in 2020. However, in 2021, we saw significant growth in global sales compared to 2020 as the demand for our products increased when many of the medical procedures delayed from 2020 were performed and the restrictions put in place in response to the pandemic were generally reduced. For further discussion of the risks and uncertainties associated with the COVID 19 pandemic, please refer to disclosure under the heading The COVID 19 pandemic has negatively impacted our business and operations around the world and may continue to materially and adversely impact our business, operations and financial results . set forth in Item 1A Risk Factors. In Europe, the Middle East and Africa ( EMEA), we have both direct and modified direct sales operations. Such sales operations are active throughout the region, including the largest markets in Western, Southern, Central and Eastern Europe and the emerging markets within EMEA. Our direct sales personnel are principally engaged in each of our divisions. Marketing teams responsible for each division operate clinical education programs, often directed by leading subject matter personnel, who provide technical instruction on techniques and therapies to physicians, nurses and technologists. We are currently conducting education programs specific to radial access, spinal intervention, surgical grafts, wire free tumor localization and electrophysiology. We require our international dealers to store products and sell directly to customers within defined sales territories. Each of our products must be approved for sale under the laws of the country in which it is sold. International dealers are responsible for compliance with applicable anti corruption laws, such as the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, as well as all applicable laws and regulations in their respective countries. We consider training to be a critical factor in the success of our sales force. Members of our sales force are trained by our clinical marketers, our staff professionals, consulting physicians, and senior field trainers in their respective territories. OEM Sales. Our global OEM Division sells comp1nts and finished devices, including molded comp1nts, sub assembled goods, custom kits and bulk non sterile goods, to medical device manufacturers. These products may be combined with other comp1nts and products from other companies and sold under a Merit or customer label. Products sold by our OEM Division can be customized and enhanced to customer specifications, including packaging, labeling and a variety of physical modifications. Our OEM Division serves customers with a staff of regional sales representatives based in the U.S., Europe and Asia, and a dedicated OEM Engineering and Customer Service Group. 8 Table of Contents Customers We provide products to hospitals and alternate site based physicians, technicians and nurses. Hospitals and acute care facilities in the U.S. purchase our products through our direct sales force, distributors, OEM partners, or custom procedure tray manufacturers who assemble and combine our products in custom kits and packs. Outside the U.S., hospitals and acute care facilities generally purchase our products through our direct sales force, or, in the absence of a sales force, through independent distributors or OEM partners. Research and Development Our research and development operations have been central to our historical growth, and we believe they will be critical to our continued growth. In recent years, our commitment to innovation led to the introduction of several new products, improvements to our existing products and expansion of our product lines, as well as enhancements and new equipment in our research and development facilities. We continue to develop new products and make improvements to our existing products utilizing many different sources. In 2021, our Chief Executive Officer and our Executive Vice President of Global Research & Development worked closely with our sales and marketing teams to incorporate feedback from physicians and clinicians in the field, which contributed to innovative new products and improvements to our existing products. In 2021, we completed projects that resulted in the newest additions to our product lineup SCOUT Mini Reflector, Temno Elite , 1Vac Evacuated Drainage Bottle, Siege 027 and the BlueFire Infiltration System. Currently, we have research and development facilities in California, Texas, Utah, Ireland, France, and Singapore. Manufacturing We manufacture many of our products using our proprietary technology and our expertise in plastic injection and insert molding. We generally contract with third parties for the tooling of our molds, but we design and own most of our molds. We have also received various International Standards Organization ( ISO ) certifications for many of our facilities; for further details, please refer to Item 1 Business Sustainability below. Merit Sensor Systems, Inc. ( Merit Sensors ) develops and markets silicon pressure sensors to a range of enterprises and presently supplies the sensors we use in our digital inflation devices and blood pressure sensors. Given the specialization of our manufacturing personnel and processes in our Utah and Ireland facilities, we possess the capability to strategically shift the manufacture of more technologically advanced products to those facilities and use the manufacturing capacity of our other facilities for more commoditized products. The actual determination of manufacturing location will be based upon multiple factors, including technological capabilities, market demand, acquisition and integration activities and economic and competitive conditions. We currently produce and package all of our embolic products. Manufacturing of our embolic products includes the synthesis and processing of raw materials and third party manufactured compounds. We have packaging and manufacturing facilities located in Texas, Virginia, Utah, Mexico, Brazil, Ireland, France, The Netherlands, and Singapore. See Item 2 Properties. We ship our products through distribution centers located in Virginia, Utah, Canada, Brazil, The Netherlands, United Kingdom ( UK ), South Africa, Russia, South Korea, India, New Zealand, Japan, China and Australia. Competition The medical products industry is highly competitive. Many of our competitors are much larger than us and have access to greater resources. We also compete with smaller companies that sell single or limited numbers of products in specific product lines or geographies. We compete globally in several market areas, including radiology; diagnostic and 9 Table of Contents interventional cardiology; interventional radiology; neurointerventional radiology; vascular, general and thoracic surgery; electrophysiology; cardiac rhythm management; interventional pulmonology; interventional nephrology; orthopedic spine surgery; interventional oncology; pain management; outpatient access centers; intensive care; computed tomography; ultrasound; and interventional gastroenterology. The principal competitive factors in the markets in which our products are sold are quality, price, value, product features, customer service, breadth of line, and customer relationships. We believe our products have achieved market acceptance primarily due to the quality of materials and workmanship of our products, clinical outcomes, their innovative design, our willingness to customize our products to fit customer needs, and our prompt attention to customer requests. Some of our primary competitive strengths are our relative stability in the marketplace; a comprehensive, broad line of ancillary products; and our history of introducing a variety of new products and product line extensions to the market on a regular basis. Our primary competitors in our peripheral intervention market are Teleflex Incorporated ( Teleflex ), Cook Medical Incorporated ( Cook Medical ), Medtronic plc ( Medtronic ), Boston Scientific Corporation ( Boston Scientific ), and Becton, Dickinson and Company ( BD ). Our primary competitors in our cardiac intervention market are BD, Teleflex, Medtronic, Abbott Laboratories, Terumo Corporation, Edwards Lifesciences Corporation, Cook Medical, and Boston Scientific. Our primary competitors in our spine market are Medtronic, Stryker Corporation, and Johnson & Johnson. Our primary competitors in our oncology market are BD, Hologic, Inc., Argon Medical Devices, Inc. and Cook Medical. Our primary competitors in our endoscopy market are Getinge AB, Boston Scientific, Cook Medical, and Olympus Corporation. Based on available industry data, with respect to the number of procedures performed, we believe we are a leading provider of digital inflation technology in the world. In addition, we believe we are 1 of the market leaders in the U.S. for analog inflation devices. We believe we are a market leader in the U.S. for control syringes, radar localization, waste disposal systems, embolic beads, tubing and manifolds. Although we believe our recent and planned additions to these product lines will help us compete even more effectively in both the U.S. and international markets, we cannot give any assurance that we will be able to maintain our existing competitive advantages or compete successfully in the future. Sources and Availability of Raw Materials Raw materials essential to our business are generally purchased worldwide and are normally available in quantities adequate to meet the needs of our business. Where there are exceptions, the temporary unavailability of those raw materials has not historically had a material adverse effect on our financial results; however, current fluctuations and uncertainties in supply chain, transportation logistics, and freight expenses could result in disruptions in our operations and materially impact our financial results. Proprietary Rights and Litigation We rely on a combination of patents, trade secrets, trademarks, copyrights and confidentiality agreements to protect our intellectual property. We have a number of U.S. and foreign issued patents and pending patent applications, including rights to patents and patent applications acquired through strategic transactions, which relate to various aspects of our products and technology. The duration of our patents is determined by the laws of the country of issuance and, for the U.S., is typically 20 years from the date of filing of the patent application. As of December 31, 2021, we owned approximately 1,600 U.S. and international patents and patent applications. This number decreased in 2021 because we aband1d certain patents that were expected to expire before we could obtain regulatory approval and commercialize the related products. As a result, we were able to avoid paying the significant annuities and maintenance and prosecution fees required to keep those patents alive. Additionally, we hold exclusive and non exclusive licenses to a variety of third party technologies covered by patents and patent applications. In the aggregate, our intellectual property assets are critical to our business, but no single patent, trademark or other intellectual property asset is of material importance to our business. 10 Table of Contents The Merit name and logo are trademarks in the U.S. and other countries. In addition to the Merit name and logo, we have used, registered or applied for registration of other specific trademarks and service marks to help distinguish our products, technologies and services from those of our competitors in the U.S. and foreign countries. See Item 1 Business Products above. The duration of our trademark registrations varies from country to country; in the U.S. we can generally maintain our trademark rights and renew any trademark registrations for as long as the trademarks are in use. As of December 31, 2021, we owned approximately 650 U.S. and foreign trademark registrations and trademark applications. We increased our trademark applications in 2021 in an effort to protect our trademark rights in jurisdictions outside the U.S. There is substantial litigation regarding patents and other intellectual property rights in the medical device industry. At any given time, we may be involved as either a plaintiff or a defendant, as well as a counter claimant or counter defendant, in patent, trademark, and other intellectual property infringement actions. If a court rules against us in any intellectual property litigation we could be subject to significant liabilities, be forced to seek licenses from third parties, or be prevented from marketing certain products. In addition, intellectual property litigation is costly and may consume significant time of employees and management. Regulation Corporate Integrity Agreement . In October 2020, we entered into a Corporate Integrity Agreement ( CIA ) with the Office of Inspector General ( OIG ), a five year agreement that was a condition of our settlement with the United States Department of Justice ( DOJ ). The CIA subjects us to certain compliance, monitoring, reporting, certification, oversight and training obligations. The CIA requires, among other matters, that we (i) maintain a compliance officer, a compliance committee, board review and oversight of certain federal healthcare compliance matters and compliance and disclosure programs; (ii) establish compliance policies and procedures to meet the requirements of all federal health care programs and the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ( FDA ) ; (iii) provide management certifications and compliance training and education; (iv) engage an independent review organization to conduct a thorough review of our systems, policies, processes and procedures related to promotional materials, product evaluations, consulting agreements, trainings provided to healthcare professionals, sponsorships, grants and charitable contributions; (v) implement a risk assessment and internal review process; (vi) establish a disclosure program for whistleblowers; (vii) increase oversight of the interactions between our sales personnel and healthcare providers; and (viii) report or disclose certain events and physician payments. We recently completed our first reporting year under the CIA and are in the process of implementing certain recommendations made by the independent review organization. Our failure to comply with our obligations under the CIA could result in m1tary penalties and our exclusion from participation in federal health care programs. The foregoing description of the CIA is qualified in their entirety by the full terms of the CIA, which is attached as Exhibit 10.46 hereto and incorporated herein by reference. Regulatory Approvals . Our products and operations are global and are subject to regulations by the FDA and various other federal and state agencies, as well as by foreign governmental agencies. These agencies enforce laws and regulations that control the design, development, testing, clinical trials, manufacturing, labeling, storage, advertising, marketing, distribution, and post market surveillance of our medical products. The time required to obtain approval by the FDA and other foreign governmental agencies can be lengthy and the requirements may differ. In particular, in May 2017, the EU adopted Regulation (EU) 2017 745 ( MDR ), which replaced Council Directive 93 92 EEC ( MDD ) as of May 26, 2021 Under transitional provisions, medical devices with notified body certificates issued under the MDD prior to May 26, 2021 may continue to be placed on the market for the remaining validity of the certificate or until May 26, 2024, whichever is first. After the expiry of any applicable transitional period, only devices that have been CE marked under the MDR may be placed on the market in the EU. We are preparing to comply with these new regulations before the transitional period expires. However, there will be products that we will instead choose to discontinue or postp1 introduction in the EU. This decision will depend on a number of factors, including changing business strategies, timing and cost of obtaining MDR certification, availability of necessary data and the capacity of Notified Bodies. The MDR includes increasingly stringent requirements in multiple areas, such as pre 11 Table of Contents market clinical evidence, review of high risk devices, labeling and post market surveillance. Under the MDR, pre market clinical data will now be required to obtain CE Mark approval for high risk, new and modified medical devices. U.S. and global counter part regulatory approval processes for medical devices are expensive, uncertain and lengthy. There can be no assurance that we will be able to obtain necessary regulatory approvals for any product on a timely basis or at all. Delays in receipt of or failure to receive such approvals, the loss of previously received approvals, or the failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. In May 2020, we received the CE mark for the Merit Wrapsody Endoprosthesis, and we are pursuing regulatory approval in the U.S. and elsewhere. We are conducting a large, multinational pivotal human clinical trial of the Wrapsody Endoprosthesis, which is required for us to obtain approval from the FDA and some international regulatory agencies. Human clinical trials of a medical device are often required for regulatory clearance or approval for devices and are expensive, time consuming and uncertain. Quality System Requirements. The Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act ( FDCA ) and its counterpart non U.S. laws require us to comply with quality system regulations ( QSR ) pertaining to all aspects of our product design and manufacturing processes, including requirements for packaging, labeling, record keeping, personnel training, supplier controls, design controls, complaint handling, corrective and preventive actions and internal quality system auditing. The FDA and foreign regulators enforce these requirements through periodic inspections of medical device manufacturers. These requirements are complex, technical and require substantial resources to remain compliant. Our failure or the failure of our suppliers to maintain compliance with these requirements could result in the shutdown of our manufacturing operations or the recall of our products, or could restrict our ability to obtain new product approvals or certificates from the FDA that are necessary for export of our products to foreign countries. Any of these results could have a material adverse effect on our business. If 1 of our suppliers fails to maintain compliance with our quality requirements, we may have to qualify a new supplier and could experience manufacturing delays as a result. We also could be subject to injunctions, product seizures, or civil or criminal penalties. Labeling and Promotion . Our labeling and promotional activities are also subject to scrutiny by the FDA and foreign regulators. Labeling includes not only the label on a device, but also includes any descriptive or informational literature that accompanies or is used to promote the device. Among other things, labeling violates the law if it is false or misleading in any respect or it fails to contain adequate directions for use. Moreover, product claims that are outside the approved or cleared labeling violate the FDCA and other applicable laws. If the FDA determines that our promotional materials constitute promotion of an uncleared or unapproved use, or otherwise violate the FDCA, it could request that we modify our promotional materials or subject us to regulatory or enforcement actions, including the issuance of an untitled letter, a notice of violation, a warning letter, injunction, seizure, civil fines or criminal penalties. Allegations of off label promotion can also result in enforcement action by federal, state, or foreign enforcement authorities and trigger significant civil or criminal penalties, including exclusion from the Medicare and Medicaid programs and liability under the False Claims Act, discussed further below. Our product promotion is also subject to regulation by the Federal Trade Commission (the FTC ), which has primary oversight of the advertising of unrestricted devices, including FDA cleared devices. The Federal Trade Commission Act prohibits unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in or affecting commerce, as well as unfair or deceptive practices such as the dissemination of any false or misleading advertisement pertaining to medical devices. FTC enforcement can result in orders requiring, among other things, limits on advertising, corrective advertising, consumer redress, rescission of contracts and such other relief as the FTC may deem necessary. In addition, under the federal Lanham Act and similar state laws, competitors and others can initiate litigation relating to advertising claims. Import Requirements. To import a medical device into the U.S., the importer must file an entry notice and bond with the U.S. Bureau of Customs and Border Protection ( CBP ). All devices are subject to FDA examination before release from the CBP. Any article that appears to be in violation of the FDCA may be refused admission and a notice of detention and hearing may be issued. If the FDA ultimately refuses admission, the CBP may issue a notice for redelivery and assess 12 Table of Contents liquidated damages for up to 3 times the value of the lot. Additionally, the laws of the U.S. require imported articles to have their labels accurately marked with the appropriate country of origin, the violation of which may result in confiscation, fines and penalties. Export Requirements. Products for export are subject to foreign countries import requirements and the exporting requirements of the exporting countries regulating bodies, as applicable. International sales of medical devices manufactured in the U.S. that are not approved or cleared by the FDA for use in the U.S., or are banned or deviate from lawful performance standards, are subject to FDA export requirements and we may not be able to export such products. Foreign countries often require, among other things, an FDA certificate for products for export, also called a Certificate to Foreign Government. To obtain this certificate from the FDA, the device manufacturer must apply to the FDA. The FDA certifies that the product has been granted clearance or approval in the U.S. and that the manufacturing facilities were in compliance with the QSR at the time of the last FDA inspection. Additionally, the export of our products is subject to restrictions due to trade and economic sanctions imposed by the U.S., the EU and other governments and organizations. The U.S. Departments of Justice, Commerce, State and Treasury and other federal agencies and authorities have a broad range of civil and criminal penalties they may seek to impose against corporations and individuals for violations of economic sanctions laws, export control laws, and other federal statutes and regulations, including those established by the Office of Foreign Assets Control ( OFAC ). Under these laws and regulations, as well as other export control laws, customs laws, sanctions laws and other laws governing our operations, various government agencies may require export licenses and may seek to impose modifications to business practices, including cessation of business activities in sancti1d countries or with sancti1d persons or entities. With the U.S. and other countries exploring export sanctions in response to military exercises and escalating tensions in certain parts of the world, any such export restrictions may affect the company business in certain regions of the world. Additional Post Market Requirements. As a medical device manufacturer, we are subject to other post market requirements in multiple jurisdictions, including (i) product listing, (ii) establishment registration, (iii) Unique Device Identification ( UDI ), and (iv) reports of corrections and removals. We are also subject to regulations that require manufacturers to report to the FDA, or an equivalent foreign regulatory body, any incident in which their device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or has malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if the malfunction of the device or a similar device were to recur. Our obligation to report a complaint is triggered on the date on which we become aware of an adverse event and the nature of the event. The FDA also regularly inspects companies to determine compliance with the QSRs and other post market requirements. Please refer to our discussion of the risks and uncertainties associated with these post market requirements under the heading Our products may cause or contribute to adverse medical events that we are required to report to the FDA or other governmental authorities, and if we fail to do so, we may be subject to sanctions that may materially harm our business. set forth in Item 1A Risk Factors. Reimbursement. Our products are generally used in medical procedures that are covered and reimbursed by governmental payers, such as Medicare, and or private health plans. In general, these third party payers cover a medical device and or related procedure in which the device is used only when the payer determines that healthcare outcomes are supported by medical evidence and the device and procedure is medically necessary for the diagnosis or treatment of the patient illness or injury. Even if a device has received clearance or approval for marketing by the FDA or, for uses outside of the U.S., a similar foreign regulatory agency, there is no certainty that third party payers will cover and reimburse for the cost of the device and or related procedures involving the use of the device. Because of increasing cost containment pressures, some private payers in the U.S. and government payers in foreign countries may also condition payment on the cost effectiveness of the device and or procedure. Even if coverage is available, third party payers may place restrictions on the circumstances in which they provide coverage or may offer reimbursement that is not sufficient to cover the cost of our products. If healthcare providers such as hospitals and physicians cannot obtain adequate coverage and reimbursement for our products or the procedures in which they are used, this may affect demand for our products and our business, financial condition, results of operations, or cash flows could suffer a material adverse impact. Anti Corruption Laws. Our international operations are subject to the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (the FCPA ), the U.K. Bribery Act and other foreign anti corruption laws. The FCPA prohibits offering, paying, or promising to pay 13 Table of Contents anything of value to foreign officials for the purpose of obtaining or maintaining an improper business advantage. The FCPA also requires that we maintain fair and accurate books and records and devise and maintain an adequate system of internal accounting controls. In certain countries, the individuals and entities that we regularly interact with may meet the definition of a foreign government official for purposes of the FCPA. As part of our compliance program, we train our U.S. and international employees, and we also train and monitor foreign third parties with whom we contract (e.g., distributors), to comply with the FCPA and other anti corruption laws. Failing to comply with the FCPA or any other anti corruption law could result in fines, penalties or other adverse consequences. As we expand our international operations, we continue to increase the scope of our compliance programs to match the risks relating to the potential for violations of the FCPA and other anti corruption laws. Our compliance program includes (i) policies addressing not only the FCPA, but also the provisions of a variety of anti corruption laws in multiple foreign jurisdictions, (ii) provisions relating to books and records that apply to us as a public company, and (iii) effective training for our personnel and relevant third parties. Transparency Laws. The U.S. Physician Payment Sunshine Act, and similar state laws, also include annual reporting and disclosure requirements for device manufacturers aimed at increasing the transparency of the interactions between device manufacturers and healthcare providers. Reports submitted under these new requirements are placed in a public database. Several other jurisdictions outside the U.S. have also adopted or begun adopting similar transparency laws. In addition to the burden of establishing processes for compliance, if we fail to provide these reports, or if the reports we provide are not accurate, we could be subject to significant penalties. Anti Kickback Statutes. The federal Anti Kickback Statute prohibits persons and entities from, among other things, knowingly and willfully offering or paying remuneration, directly or indirectly, to induce the purchase, order, lease, or recommendation of a good or service for which payment may be made in whole or part under a federal healthcare program such as Medicare or Medicaid, unless the arrangement fits within 1 of several statutory exemptions or regulatory safe harbors. The definition of remuneration has been broadly interpreted to include anything of value, including, for example, gifts, discounts, the furnishing of supplies or equipment, credit arrangements, payments of cash and waivers of payments. Violations can result in significant penalties, imprisonment and exclusion from Medicare, Medicaid and other federal healthcare programs. Exclusion of a manufacturer would preclude any federal healthcare program from paying for the manufacturer products. Under the Affordable Care Act, a violation of the Anti Kickback Statute is deemed to be a violation of the False Claims Act, which is discussed in more detail below. A party failure to fully satisfy the obligations of a regulatory safe harbor provision may result in increased scrutiny by government enforcement authorities. In addition to the federal Anti Kickback Statute, many states have their own anti kickback laws. Often, these laws closely follow the language of the federal law, although they do not always have the same exceptions or safe harbors. In some states, these anti kickback laws apply with respect to all payers, including commercial health insurance companies. Government officials continue their vigorous enforcement efforts on the sales and marketing activities of pharmaceutical, medical device and other healthcare companies, including the pursuit of cases against individuals or entities that allegedly offered unlawful inducements to potential or existing customers to procure their business. Settlements of these government cases have involved significant fines and penalties and, in some instances, criminal proceedings. False Claims Laws. The False Claims Acts prohibit any person from knowingly presenting, or causing to be presented, a false claim for payment to the federal government or knowingly making, or causing to be made, a false statement to get a claim paid. The Civil False Claims Act can be violated without actual knowledge and only requires reckless disregard or deliberate ignorance, while the Criminal False Claims Act requires a higher knowledge standard of actual knowledge and intent to violate. Manufacturers can be held liable under the False Claims Acts, even if they do not submit claims to the government, if they are found to have caused the submission of false claims (e.g., by third parties such as healthcare providers). The Civil False Claims Act also includes whistleblower provisions that allow private citizens to bring suit against an entity or individual on behalf of the U.S. and to recover a portion of any m1tary recovery. Many of the recent, highly publicized settlements in the healthcare industry relating to sales and marketing practices have been cases brought under the Civil False Claims Act. Most states also have adopted statutes or regulations similar to the federal laws, which apply to Item and services reimbursed under Medicaid and other state programs. Sanctions under the federal False Claims Acts and similar state laws may include civil m1tary penalties, treble damages, criminal fines and or imprisonment. 14 Table of Contents Labor Standards Laws. We are also subject to corporate social responsibility ( CSR ) laws and regulations which require us to monitor the labor standards in our supply chain, including the California Transparency in Supply Chains Act, the UK Modern Slavery Act, and U.S. Federal Acquisition Regulations regarding Combating Trafficking in Persons. These CSR laws and regulations may impose additional processes and supplier management systems and have led certain key customers to impose additional requirements on medical device companies, including audits, as a prerequisite to selling products to such customers, which could result in increased costs for our products, the termination or suspension of certain suppliers, and reductions in our margins and profitability. Privacy and Security. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ( HIPAA ), the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (the HITECH Act ), and accompanying rules, require certain entities, referred to as covered entities (including most healthcare providers and health plans), to comply with established standards, including standards regarding the privacy and security of protected health information ( PHI ). Many state laws also regulate the use and disclosure of health information and require notification in the event of a breach of such information. The EU has adopted a single EU privacy regulation, the General Data Protection Regulation ( GDPR ). The GDPR can have an extraterritorial scope and, in particular, applies to the processing of personal data in the context of the activities of an establishment of a company (controller or a processor) in the EU, regardless of whether the processing takes place in the EU or not. In addition, it applies to the processing of personal data of data subjects who are in the EU by a controller or processor not established in the EU, where the processing activities are related to (a) the offering of goods or services, irrespective of whether a payment of the data subject is required, to such data subjects in the EU; or (b) the monitoring of their behavior as far as their behavior takes place within the EU. The GDPR provides for a harmonization of the data protection regulations throughout the EU. It imposes a strict data protection compliance regime with severe penalties of up to the greater of 4% of the total worldwide annual turnover of the preceding financial year or 20 million (whichever is higher) and includes new rights such as the portability of personal data. Although the GDPR applies across the EU without a need for local implementing legislation, it contains a number of opener clauses enabling the EU Member States to provide for additional legislation. In addition, local data protection authorities still have the ability to interpret the GDPR, which has the potential to create inconsistencies on a country by country basis. We have implemented changes to our business practices to comply with the GDPR. As a consequence of Brexit, the GDPR no longer directly applies in the UK. However, the UK Data Protection Act 2018 remains in force, which incorporates the GDPR into UK legislation with some minor amendments to take account of the UK's departure from the EU. Thus, we remain subject to the applicable provisions of the GDPR in the UK. The People Republic of China has introduced a comprehensive personal information protection regime by establishing a unified, cross sector legislation, as the EU does with the GDPR. This legislation, called the Personal Information Protection Law ( PIPL ), went into effect on November 1, 2021, and has many aspects that are similar to the GDPR. The PIPL sets rules for the processing activities such as collection, use, sharing, transfer, and disclosure of personal information in China. It also applies to the personal information processing activities outside of China if relevant business operators (a) aim at providing products or services to individuals in China; or (b) engage in analyzing and evaluating the behavior of individuals in China. Among others, the PIPL requires companies as personal information processors (which can be viewed as equivalent to data controllers under the GDPR) to obtain informed consents from the data subjects for the processing activities of their personal information, and separate consents under certain circumstances such as cross border transfer of personal information. The PIPL also requires storage of personal information locally in China if the company is certified as a critical information infrastructure operator ( CIIO ) or processing personal information exceeding a certain volume threshold. Further, the PIPL grants statutory rights to data subjects, such as the right to information, the right to withdraw consents, the right of data portability, and the right to refuse automated decision making. In addition, the PIPL also imposes a number of new administrative requirements on the personal information processors, including, among others, designating a data protection officer if certain conditions are met, signing data processing agreements with entrusted processors (which can be viewed as equivalent to data processors under the GDPR), preparing data breach notices, conducting a personal information impact assessment as required, and obtaining regulatory approval for certain cross border data transfer activities. Violations of the PIPL may incur severe penalties, including a fine of up to RMB 50 million or 5% of the company's annual turnover in the preceding year, revocation of the company license to do business in China, and personal liabilities for company executives. As the PIPL is new and relevant implementation rules are to be finalized 15 Table of Contents and released, we are in the process of implementing changes to our business practices to comply with the PIPL while monitoring further developments in the law. We post on our websites our privacy notices, policies and practices regarding the collection, use and disclosure of user data. Any failure, or perceived failure, by us to comply with our posted privacy notices or policies or with any applicable regulatory requirements or orders, or privacy, data protection, information security or consumer protection related privacy laws and regulations in 1 or more jurisdictions could result in proceedings or actions against us by governmental entities or others, including class action privacy litigation in certain jurisdictions, subject us to significant fines, penalties, judgments and negative publicity, require us to change our business practices, increase the costs and complexity of compliance, and adversely affect our business. Data protection, privacy and information security have become the subject of increasing public, media and legislative concern. For example, California Consumer Protection Act went into effect on January 1, 2020, giving consumers the right to demand certain information and actions from companies who collect personal information. This enhanced scrutiny and legal requirements could result in costly compliance efforts and potentially result in fines, harm to reputation, or other consequences. If our customers were to reduce their use of our products and services as a result of these concerns, our business could be materially harmed. As noted above, we are also subject to the possibility of security and privacy breaches, which themselves may result in a violation of these privacy laws. CARES Act. On March 27, 2020, the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act ( CARES Act ) was signed into law. The $22 trillion economic stimulus bill contains numerous tax law changes. The CARES Act esta blished a program with provisions to allow U.S. companies to defer the employer portion of social security taxes between March 27, 2020 and December 31, 2020 and pay such taxes in 2 installments in 2021 and 2022 As permitted by the CARES Act we have deferred payment of the employer portion of social security payroll tax payments and made a payment equal to 1 half of the deferred amount during the year ended December 31, 2021 Seasonality Our worldwide sales have not historically reflected a significant degree of seasonality; however, customer purchases have historically been lower during the third quarter of the year, as compared to other quarters. This reflects, among other factors, lower demand during summer months in countries in the northern hemisphere. Sustainability In recent years, the sustainability of our business has become a key focus of our management team. Under the oversight of our Board of Directors, we have created a cross functional Corporate Sustainability Council that is driving long term Environment, Social and Governance ( ESG ) goals across our enterprise. These efforts have included proactive actions to address both risks and opportunities related to our sustainability program, as we strive for continued growth and profitability. The majority of our products are disposable medical devices and are generally disposed of after a single use due primarily to the risks of exposing patients to bloodborne pathogens capable of transmitting disease or other potentially infectious materials. Additionally, repeated sterilization to address such risks is not possible because it may adversely affect the quality of the materials used in many of our products and result in the failure of our product to function properly if used in multiple medical procedures. Consequently, many of our used products will likely end up in a medical waste disposal facility at the end of their usefulness. We continue to look for opportunities to deliver sustainable, long term growth of our business. Our sustainability practices are an integral comp1nt of our business strategy, and our sustainability activities are reviewed and approved by senior management and our Board of Directors. 16 Table of Contents By assessing our sustainability opportunities, w e have developed areas of focus where we are positi1d to make a positive impact. These include programs designed to reduce waste, improve efficiency, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, and protect the environment. Our sustainability values in action include achievement of ISO 14001 certification at eight of our largest manufacturing facilities with a continued goal of achieving this certification at all our manufacturing and major distribution facilities (ISO 14001 is the international standard that specifies requirements for an effective environmental management system); achievement of ISO 45001 certification at five of our eight largest manufacturing facilities, and our goal is to achieve this certification at all our manufacturing facilities in 2023 (ISO 45001 is the international standard that specifies requirements for an effective safety management system); achievement of ISO 50001 certification at our Galway and Singapore facilities, and our goal is to achieve ISO 50001 certification at all our manufacturing facilities by the end of 2023 (ISO 50001 is the international standard that specifies requirements for an effective energy management system); establishment and support of employee gardens that promote pollination and provide farm to table nutrition for our employees at our headquarters in South Jordan, Utah; transition to re usable pallets and methods to move products in bulk containers, reducing intra company shipping materials; reduction in packaging materials by implementing product family packaging reviews to consolidate shipments by better understanding our customers purchasing practices these reviews often allow us to increase quantities per box, eliminate the usage of intermediate packaging, reducing film thickness and use original product packaging where possible; transition from paper work orders to electronic work orders through our internally designed eWorq program at full completion, this project will save millions of pieces of paper and thousands of plastic sleeves annually currently we are working to implement this program at our largest manufacturing facilities in South Jordan, Utah and Tijuana, Mexico during 2022, with plans to continue the roll out to other sites thereafter; expansion of recycling programs where our employees recycle materials, including food waste, paper, cardboard, food and beverage containers, scrap metal, and pallets, and re use of our plastic scrap waste leftover from our manufacturing process of our molded parts; placement of free car charging stations for employees who have transiti1d to electric vehicles; installation of efficient heating and cooling systems that operate on variable efficiency drives, increasing our energy efficiency at our headquarters in South Jordan, Utah and our transition to Light Emitting Diode ( LED ) lighting in our manufacturing facilities; and operation of an environmental tracking system at our world wide facilities to facilitate monthly reporting and accountability for energy, water, waste, recycling, and scope 1, 2, and 3 greenhouse gas emissions metrics this system supports our 2030 operational sustainability goals. To learn more about our sustainability programs and accomplishments, you may visit www.merit.com about corporate sustainability ; however, the information on this website is not, and will not be deemed, a part of this report or incorporated into any other filings we make with the SEC. Human Capital Management As of December 31, 2021, we had 6,446 employees located in approximately 40 different countries in a variety of different roles. In the highly competitive medical device industry, we consider attracting, developing, and retaining talented people in technical, operational, marketing, sales, research, management, and other positions to be critical to our overall long term growth strategy. Our ability to recruit and retain such talent depends on several factors, including compensation and benefits, talent development, career opportunities, and work environment. We invest in our people and cultivate a company culture committed to supporting a diverse and inclusive workforce. 17 Table of Contents Diversity and Inclusion. Our goal is to create a diverse and inclusive global culture that reflects the diversity of the customers we serve and encourages an environment where employees feel welcomed, respected, and valued. With this goal in mind, in late 2020 the Company hired its first Chief Human Resources Officer who, in part, has been charged with working with our leadership team to strengthen and enhance our diversity and inclusion efforts company wide. We are committed to providing equal opportunity in all aspects of employment. In the U.S., we are an equal opportunity affirmative action employer committed to making employment decisions without regard to race, religion, ethnicity or national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristics protected by law. Over 50% of our U.S. employee population identifies as non white. To further promote a culture of inclusion, during 2021 we started the Women Leadership Initiative ( WLI ), our first ever affinity group led by women and open to all Merit employees. The WLI contributes to our long term strategies by promoting a culture of diversity, equity and inclusion through (i) sponsoring professional development activities focused on overcoming barriers and restraints to the advancement of women careers, (ii) facilitating external interactions with organizations and thought leaders, and (iii) providing resources focused on improving diversity, equity, and inclusion. Employee Engagement. The engagement of our workforce is critical to delivering on our competitive strategy, and we place high importance on informed and engaged employees. We communicate frequently with our employees through a variety of communication methods, including video and written communications, town hall meetings, and our company intranet, and we acknowledge individual contributions to Merit by celebrating milest1s of service in five year increments. As a result of the COVID 19 pandemic, we strengthened our communication platforms. Our employee communications during the pandemic have kept our employees informed on critical priorities, important actions being taken by management in response to the pandemic, and continued efforts to protect employee health, safety and well being. In addition, the human resource team expanded with the hiring of a Senior Director of Internal Communications, to specifically focus on improving employee communications. Compensation and Benefits. Because our mission is to create innovative medical devices that improve lives, we aim to hire and develop employees who want to build something special through hard work, team effort, and commitment. That is why we provide all our employees with competitive benefit packages and strive to provide the most cost effective medical benefits and wellness programs. As a result of our focus on competitive health and wellness benefits, we have achieved our seventh consecutive year of zero health care plan cost increases for our U.S. employees who participate in our group healthcare plans. Our benefits include competitive pay, annual incentive awards and bonus opportunities, healthcare and retirement benefits, an Employee Stock Purchase Plan, paid time off and sick leave, paid parental leave, flexible work schedules, remote working opportunities, and a wellness program. Talent Development. In 2021, we hired our first ever Vice President of Global HR Operations to focus on global programs around employee performance, development and engagement. To improve employee performance, we have begun building out a global performance management program which will be officially launched in 2023 alongside our new human resources information system. Employee development programs are being executed at different regional and local levels with a focus on management and leadership development. We have also invested time and resources to strengthen employee engagement. For example, we have partnered with Gallup, a global research and worldwide leader on the topic of engagement, to support efforts in understanding our employee sentiment worldwide. To accomplish this, we are developing a program for surveying employees on a regular basis and creating manager action plans based on the feedback of those surveys. Community. Our employees are actively involved in their communities and supporting causes. At our headquarters, we provide an onsite garden where employees take n growing and distributing produce to employees and to the local community. Employees also actively support causes by raising awareness and funds for non profit organizations. Areas that our employees have supported in recent years include Breast Cancer Awareness Month, Heart Health Month, children charities and supporting those in need. In 2021, we resumed our support of humanitarian missions and medical education conferences, albeit in a limited fashion considering restrictions imposed in light of the COVID 19 pandemic. We were able to partner with the Heineman Robicsek Medical Outreach group to provide critical products to support its medical mission to Belize. As the world continues to move forward considering the new normal presented by the COVID 18 Table of Contents 19 pandemic, we are anxious to resume our historical volume of support for bringing healthcare to underserved areas of the globe. Wellness. Wellness is at the foundation of creating a positive employee experience. At our company headquarters in Utah, we have an onsite medical clinic available for our employees and their families where we provide preventative and general medical care. The clinic also currently provides employees with COVID 19 vaccination shots, boosters, and testing. In addition, we have a Chief Wellness Officer dedicated to designing programs and initiatives that support the physical, emotional, and mental health of our employees. This year, we launched a wellness committee and created a Get Healthy wellness program available to all sites across the globe. Programs include providing health information from health and nutrition experts, newsletters with wellness and nutrition tips, and activities promoting health and wellbeing such as walking groups. Some programs include suicide prevention awareness, on site diabetes screenings, immunizations, lifestyle modification to prevent diseases, tobacco cessation, breast cancer awareness, and our Smart Choice meal program designed by our onsite nutritionist and chef to provide free heart healthy meals to employees in our Utah headquarters. COVID 19 Response; Health and Safety. During the COVID 19 pandemic, the majority of our manufacturing employees have continued to work from our facilities, where we have adopted health screening, implemented social distancing and personal protective equipment requirements, enhanced food service, cleaning and sanitation procedures, and modified workspaces to reduce the potential for disease transmission, and implemented a COVID 19 vaccine mandate for our U.S. employees. Most employees who do not require access to our facility to perform their work have been working from home during the pandemic, without a significant impact to productivity. Information Security We maintain strong cybersecurity systems to guard against unauthorized access, malicious software, corruption of data, disruption of our ne2rks and systems and unauthorized release of confidential information. We employ an experienced and dedicated information security team, follow industry best practices, and work with our employees globally to create awareness and mitigate cyber risk. On an ongoing basis, we assess risks and implement procedures and practices designed to improve the security, confidentiality, integrity and availability of our systems. We voluntarily engage third party security auditors to test our systems and controls at least annually against the most widely recognized security standards and regulations. We have developed and continue to implement a continuing cyber awareness training program which is designed to increase awareness of cybersecurity threats throughout our company and reduce the risk of human error. We conduct periodic phishing testing on all our employees with e mail access and emphasize information security in training events and programs we host throughout the year . We have established controls and procedures to escalate enterprise level issues, including cybersecurity matters, to the appropriate management levels within our organization and our Board of Directors, or members or committees thereof, as appropriate. Our Board of Directors is responsible for enterprise risk management, including our approach to managing cybersecurity risk, and has delegated oversight responsibility to its Audit Committee. The Audit Committee regularly reviews information security risks and receives reports from our Chief Technology Officer and other members of the Company management regarding those risks. Under our framework, cybersecurity issues are analyzed by subject matter experts for potential financial, operational, and reputational risks, based on, among other factors, the nature of the matter and breadth of impact. Matters determined to present potential material impacts to the Company financial results, operations, and or reputation are immediately reported by management to our Board of Directors or its Audit Committee, as appropriate, in accordance with our escalation framework. In addition, we have established procedures to ensure that management responsible for overseeing the effectiveness of disclosure controls is informed in a timely manner of known cybersecurity risks and incidents that may materially impact our operations and that timely public disclosure is made as appropriate. We maintain cyber insurance coverage that may, subject to policy terms, conditions and limitations, cover certain aspects of cybersecurity risks; however, such insurance coverage may be unavailable or insufficient to cover all losses or all types of claims that may arise in the continually evolving area of cyber risk. During the last 3 years, we have not experienced a material security breach and, as a result, we have not incurred any material expenses from such a breach. Furthermore, during such time, we have not been penalized or paid any amount under any information security breach settlement. 19 Table of Contents Recent Developments N1 Available Information We file annual, quarterly and current reports and other information with the SEC. The SEC maintains an Internet site that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers that file electronically with the SEC. The address of the SEC internet website is www.sec.gov. Our internet address is www.merit.com. On our Investor Relations website, www.merit.com investors, we make available, free of charge, a variety of information for investors. Our goal is to maintain the Investor Relations website as a portal through which investors can easily find or navigate to pertinent information about us, including Our annual report on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K, and any amendments to those reports, as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file that material with or furnish it to the SEC. Press releases on our quarterly earnings and other pertinent information, including product launches, corporate initiatives, and participation in upcoming investor conferences. Corporate governance information including our corporate governance guidelines, committee charters, and codes of business conduct and ethics. Additionally, we provide electronic and paper copies of such filings free of charge upon request. The information on www.merit.com is not, and will not be deemed, a part of this report or incorporated into any other filings we make with the SEC. Financial Information About Foreign and Domestic Sales For financial information relating to our foreign and domestic sales see Note 2 and Note 13 to our consolidated financial statements set forth in Item 8 of this report. 20 Table of Contents Item 1A. Risk Factors. Our business, operations and financial condition are subject to certain risks and uncertainties. Should 1 or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should any underlying assumptions prove incorrect, our actual results will vary, and may vary materially, from those anticipated, estimated, projected or expected. Among the key factors that may have a direct bearing on our business, operations or financial condition are the factors identified below Business, Economic, Industry and Operational Risks Changes in general economic conditions, geopolitical conditions, domestic and foreign trade policies, m1tary policies and other factors beyond our control may adversely impact our business and operating results. Our operations and performance depend significantly on global, regional and U.S. economic and geopolitical conditions. Russia invasion and military attacks on Ukraine have triggered significant sanctions from U.S. and European leaders. These events are currently escalating and creating increasingly volatile global economic conditions. Resulting changes in U.S. trade policy could trigger retaliatory actions by Russia, its allies and other affected countries, including China, resulting in a trade war. A trade war could result in increased costs for raw materials we use in our manufacturing and could result in Russia and other foreign governments imposing tariffs on products that we export outside the U.S. or otherwise limiting our ability to sell our products abroad. These increased costs would have a negative effect on our financial condition and profitability. Furthermore, if the conflict between Russia and Ukraine continues for a long period of time, or if other countries, including the U.S., become further involved in the conflict, we could face significant adverse effects to our business and financial condition. The United Kingdom ( UK ) departure from the European Union ( EU ) (commonly known as Brexit ) has created uncertainties affecting business operations in the UK, the EU and a number of other countries, including with respect to compliance with the regulatory regimes regarding the labeling and registration of the products we sell in these markets. While we have taken proactive steps to mitigate possible disruption to our operations, we still could face increased costs, volatility in exchange rates, market instability and other risks, depending on the effects of existing and future agreements between the UK and EU regarding Brexit and the future EU UK trading relationship. The above factors, including a number of other economic and geopolitical factors both in the U.S. and abroad, could ultimately have material adverse effects on our business, financial condition, results of operations or cash flows, including the following effects of significant changes in economic, m1tary and fiscal policies in the U.S. and abroad including currency fluctuations, inflationary pressures and significant income tax changes; a global or regional economic slowdown in any of our market segments; changes in government policies and regulations affecting the Company or its significant customers; industrial policies in various countries that favor domestic industries over multinationals or that restrict foreign companies altogether; new or stricter trade policies and tariffs enacted by countries, such as China, in response to changes in U.S. trade policies and tariffs; postp1ment of spending, in response to tighter credit, financial market volatility and other factors; rapid material escalation of the cost of regulatory compliance and litigation; difficulties protecting intellectual property; longer payment cycles; credit risks and other challenges in collecting accounts receivable; and the impact of each of the foregoing on outsourcing and procurement arrangements. Termination or interruption of our supply relationships and increases in labor costs and the prices of our comp1nt parts, finished products, third party services and raw materials, particularly petroleum based products, is negatively impacting our business and could have a further adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition . We rely on raw materials, comp1nt parts, finished products and third party services in connection with our business. For example, substantially all of our products are sterilized by only a few different entities. If any of these sterilizers goes 21 Table of Contents out of business or fails to comply with quality or regulatory requirements, we may be unable to find a suitable supplier to replace them. This could significantly delay or stop production and cause sales of such products to materially decline. Additionally, many of our products have comp1nts that are manufactured using resins, plastics and other petroleum based materials which are available from a limited number of suppliers. We are experiencing a growing trend among suppliers of polymer resins to refuse to supply resin to the medical device manufacturers or to require such manufacturers to assume additional risks due to the potential for product liability claims. Additionally, there is no assurance that crude oil supplies will be uninterrupted or that petroleum based manufacturing materials will be available for purchase in the future. The military conflict between Russia and Ukraine may increase the likelihood of supply interruptions and further hinder our ability to find the materials we need to make our products. Supply disruptions are making it harder for us to find favorable pricing and reliable sources for the materials we need, putting upward pressure on our costs and increasing the risk that we may be unable to acquire the materials and services we need to continue to make certain products. The availability and price of these materials, parts, products and services are affected by a variety of factors beyond our control, including the willingness of suppliers to sell into the medical device industry, changes in supply and demand, general economic conditions, labor costs, fuel related transportation costs, liability concerns, climate change (including new and existing laws and regulations to address climate change), competition, import duties, tariffs, currency exchange rates and political uncertainty around the world. Our suppliers often pass some of their cost increases on to us, and if such increased costs are sustained or increase further, our suppliers may pass further cost increases on to us. In addition to the effect on resin prices, transportation costs have generally increased and may further increase if crude oil prices increase. Our transportation and service providers are typically able to pass any significant increases in oil prices on to us. Our costs may also be impacted by laws to increase minimum wages, including the potential increase to the federal minimum wage in the United States that has been recently proposed by the current administration. Our ability to recover such increased costs may depend upon our ability to raise prices on our products. Due to the highly competitive nature of the healthcare industry and the cost containment efforts of our customers and third party payers, we may be unable to pass along cost increases through higher prices. If we are unable to fully recover these costs through price increases or offset these increases through cost reductions, or we experience terminations or interruption of our relationships with our suppliers, we could experience lower margins and profitability, and our results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be materially harmed. Any damage or interruption to our facilities, infrastructure, manufacturing processes or information technology systems, or those of our suppliers, could result in lost revenues and our business could be seriously harmed. Damage or interruption to our facilities or systems relating to manufacturing, distribution, research and development, or information technology because of fire, extreme weather conditions, natural disaster, power loss, communications failure, geopolitical disruption, labor strikes, riots, cyber attack, health epidemics and pandemics, unauthorized entry or other events could significantly disrupt our operations, the operations of suppliers and critical infrastructure. These events may also delay or prevent product manufacturing and shipment during the time required to repair, rebuild or replace the damaged facilities or systems. We have recently closed certain facilities and moved operations and resources to other facilities. As a result, this concentration of resources may further exacerbate the adverse effects of these events or make it more difficult for us to respond to the effects of these events. Climate change may increase both the frequency and severity of natural disasters and, consequently, risks to our operations and growth. Although we maintain property damage and business interruption i nsurance coverage on our facilities , our insurance might not cover all losses under such circumstances, and we may not be able to renew or obtain such insurance in the future on acceptable terms with adequate coverage or at reasonable costs. Consolidation in the healthcare industry, group purchasing organizations and public procurement policies have lead to demands for price concessions, which reduces our revenues and may harm our ability to sell our products at prices necessary to support our current business strategies. Healthcare costs have risen significantly over the past decade, which has resulted in or led to numerous cost reform initiatives by legislators, regulators and third party payers. Cost reform has triggered a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry to aggregate purchasing power, which has created more requests for pricing concessions and is expected to continue in the future. Additionally, many of our customers belong to group purchasing organizations or integrated delivery ne2rks that use their market power to consolidate purchasing decisions for these hospitals and healthcare service 22 Table of Contents providers. These customers are often able to obtain lower prices and more favorable terms because of the potential sales volume they represent, which has lead to lower revenues and required us to take on additional liability. We expect that market demand, government regulation, third party coverage and reimbursement policies and societal pressures will continue to change the healthcare industry worldwide, resulting in further business consolidations and alliances among our customers, which may exert further downward pressure on the prices of our products. We may be unable to compete in our markets, particularly if there is a significant change in relevant practices or technology. The markets in which our products compete are highly competitive. We face competition from many companies which are larger, better established, have greater financial, technical and other resources and possess a greater market presence than we do. Such resources and market presence may enable our competitors to more effectively market competing products or to market competing products at reduced prices in order to gain market share. In addition, our ability to compete successfully is dependent, in part, upon our response to changes in technology and upon our efforts to develop and market new products which achieve significant market acceptance. Competing companies with substantially greater resources than us are actively engaged in research and development of new methods, treatments, drugs, and procedures to treat or prevent cardiovascular disease that could limit the market for our products and eventually make some of our products obsolete. A reduction in the demand for a significant number of our products, or a few key products, could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. COVID 19 Pandemic Risks The COVID 19 pandemic has negatively impacted our business and operations around the world and may continue to materially and adversely impact our business, operations and financial results . The COVID 19 pandemic has created significant disruption and uncertainty in the global economy, has negatively impacted our business, results of operations and financial condition, and we anticipate that it will continue to negatively impact our business, results of operations and financial condition for the foreseeable future. Numerous national, international, state and local jurisdictions have imposed, and may further impose, a variety of government orders and restrictions for their residents to control the spread of COVID 19. In 2020, such orders and restrictions caused significant alterations of our operations, work stoppages, slowdowns and delays, travel restrictions and event cancellations, among other effects, thereby significantly and negatively impacting our financial condition. In 2021, these conditions continued at varying levels throughout the year. Other disruptions that we experienced, which persist in various regions throughout the world, include (i) restrictions on our personnel and personnel of business partners to travel and access customers for training and case support (ii) supply chain delays and disruptions, logistical challenges and increased freight, transportation and other expenses; (iii) delays in regulatory approvals by governmental and regulatory bodies; (iv) reductions in spending by our customers; (v) diversion of or limitations on employee resources that would otherwise be focused on the operations of our business, including because of sickness of employees or their families or the desire of employees to avoid contact with large groups of people (vi) fluctuations in the availability of employees and potential employees (vii) additional government requirements or other incremental mitigation efforts that may further impact our or our suppliers' capacity to manufacture our products; (viii) disruption of our research and development activities; and (ix) delays in ongoing studies and pre clinical trials. Although some of these disruptions diminished in 2021, they may again return or further intensify their effect on our operations, whether as a direct result of the COVID 19 pandemic or other factors exacerbated by the effects of the COVID 19 pandemic. In addition, elective procedures that use our products significantly decreased in number during much of 2020 as health care organizations around the world prioritized the treatment of patients with COVID 19 and reduced spending in other areas. For example, in the United States, governmental authorities recommended, and in certain cases required, that elective, deferrable, specialty and other procedures and appointments (many of which use our products), be suspended or canceled to avoid non essential patient exposure to medical environments and potential infection with COVID 19 and to focus limited resources and personnel capacity toward the treatment of COVID 19 patients. In 2021, these procedures resumed in many locations, and overall, we saw significant improvement in our business during 2021; however, it is 23 Table of Contents unclear when or if a resurgence of COVID 19, or increased spread of its variants, may again cause a rise in severe infections and force authorities and customers to impose restrictions that will negatively impact our operations. All of these factors have also caused or contributed to disruptions and delays in our logistics and supply chain, and we may continue to experience these disruptions and delays. The full extent to which the COVID 19 pandemic impacts our business, operations and financial results will depend on future developments that are uncertain and cannot be predicted, including new information that may emerge concerning the severity and spread of the virus and its variants. To the extent the COVID 19 pandemic continues to adversely affect our business, operations and financial results, it may also have the effect of heightening other risks described herein, such as those relating to general economic conditions, demand for our products, relationships with suppliers and sales efforts. Strategic, Business Development and Employee Attraction and Retention Risks We may be unable to successfully manage growth and maintain operational efficiencies. Successful implementation and execution of our business strategy will require that we effectively manage our growth. As the Company grows, we are often faced with decisions to (i) expand certain product lines and discontinue others, (ii) open or expand new facilities and close others, (iii) allocate resources between new and established markets, or (iv) allocate resources between the expansion of organic business and the acquisition of new product lines. The outcome of each of these decisions is uncertain, and even with the exercise of excellent business judgment, results may not align with expectations because of the many factors listed in this section. In addition, our management will need to continue to implement changes in certain aspects of our business, improve our information systems, infrastructure and operations to respond to increased demand, attract and retain qualified personnel, and develop, train, and manage an increasing number of employees. We may not have the resources available to implement certain necessary changes, and as a result, growth may be delayed or we may not be able to take advantage of certain business opportunities. Growth has placed, and will likely continue to place, an increasing strain on our management, sales and other personnel, and on our financial, product design, marketing, distribution, technology and other resources. Any failure to manage growth effectively could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Substantial costs are incurred when identifying, evaluating, negotiating and closing acquisitions, and failure to integrate acquired businesses may adversely impact our business and financial results. Over the past several years, we have completed a series of significant acquisitions and, in the future we may consider other potential acquisitions and strategic transactions, certain of which may also be significant. We have incurred, and will likely continue to incur, significant expenses in connection with negotiating and consummating various acquisition and other strategic transactions. As we grow through acquisitions, we face the additional challenges of integrating the operations, culture, information management systems and other characteristics of the acquired entity with our own, including sales models related to capital equipment. Our efforts to integrate acquisitions may be hampered by delays, the loss of certain employees, suppliers or customers, proceedings resulting from employment terminations, culture clashes, unbudgeted costs, and other issues, which may occur at levels that are more severe or prolonged than anticipated. Additionally, past and future acquisitions may increase the risks of competition we face by, among other things, extending our operations into industry segments and product lines where we have few existing customers or qualified sales personnel and limited expertise. Further, as a result of certain acquisitions, we are selling capital equipment, in addition to our historical sales of disposable medical devices. The sale of capital equipment may create additional risks and potential liability, which may negatively affect our business, operations or financial condition. In addition, we may not realize competitive advantages, synergies or other benefits anticipated in connection with any such acquisition or other transaction. If we do not adequately identify and value targets for, or manage issues related to, 24 Table of Contents acquisitions and strategic transactions, such transactions may not produce the anticipated benefits and have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We will be required to expend significant resources for research, development, testing and regulatory approval or clearance of our products under development, and these products may not be developed successfully or approved for commercial use . Most of our products under development will require significant additional research, development, engineering and, in some cases, preclinical and clinical testing, as well as regulatory approval or clearance and a commitment of significant additional resources prior to their commercialization. It is possible that our products may not be developed successfully; be proven safe or effective in clinical trials; offer therapeutic or other improvements over current treatments and products; meet applicable regulatory standards or receive regulatory approvals or clearances; be capable of production in commercial quantities at acceptable costs and in compliance with regulatory requirements; be successfully marketed; or be covered by private or public insurers. We may be unable to accurately forecast customer demand for our products and manage our inventory. To ensure adequate supply, we must forecast our inventory needs and place orders with our suppliers based on estimates of future demand for particular products. Our ability to accurately forecast demand for our products could be negatively affected by many factors, including our failure to accurately manage our expansion strategy and customer acceptance of new products, product introductions by our competitors, an increase or decrease in customer demand for our products or for products of our competitors, unanticipated changes in general market conditions or regulatory matters and weakening of economic conditions, effects of the COVID 19 pandemic or consumer confidence in future economic conditions. Inventory levels in excess of customer demand may result in inventory write downs or write offs, which would impact our gross margin. Conversely, if we underestimate customer demand for our products, our manufacturing facilities may not be able to deliver products to meet our order requirements, which could damage our reputation and customer relationships. Our forecasts of customer demand and related decisions that we make about production levels may take into account potential opportunities created by regulatory issues, supply disruptions or other challenges experienced by our competitors. We generally do not know the extent and cannot predict the duration of these challenges experienced by our competitors. As a result, our estimates about related increased demand for our products are inherently uncertain and subject to change. If our estimates incorrectly forecast the extent or duration of this increased demand, or the product types to which it relates, our revenues, margins and earnings could be adversely affected. We lack direct sales and marketing capabilities in many countries and are dependent on our distributors for the commercialization of our products in these countries. If we are unable to maintain or establish sales capabilities on our own or through third parties, we may not be able to commercialize any of our products in those countries . We have no or limited direct sales or marketing capabilities in some of the regions and countries in which our products are sold, including, among others, China, Japan, Russia and India. We have entered into distribution agreements with third parties to market and sell our products in those countries in which we do not have a direct sales force and in those countries in which we utilize a modified direct sales approach. If we are unable to maintain or enter into such distribution arrangements on acceptable terms, or at all, we may not be able to successfully commercialize our products in certain countries. Moreover, to the extent that we enter into distribution arrangements with other companies, our revenues, if any, will depend on the terms of any such arrangements and the efforts of others. These efforts may turn out not to be sufficient and our third party distributors may not effectively sell our products. In addition, although our contract terms require our distributors to comply with all applicable laws regarding the sale of our products, including anti competition, anti corruption, anti m1y laundering and sanctions laws, we may not be able to ensure proper compliance. If our distributors 25 Table of Contents fail to effectively market and sell our products in full compliance with applicable laws, our results of operations and business could be impacted. We are dependent upon key personnel . Our success is dependent on key management personnel, including Fred P. Lampropoulos, our Chairman of the Board, President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Lampropoulos is not subject to any agreement prohibiting his departure, and we do not maintain key man life insurance on his life. The loss of Mr. Lampropoulos, or of certain other key management personnel, could have a materially adverse effect on our business and operations. Our success also depends on, among other factors, the successful recruitment and retention of key operating, manufacturing, sales and other personnel. Regulatory, Litigation, Tax and Legal Compliance Risks Regulations and trade policies implemented by foreign governments to reduce the costs of healthcare or promote business in their countries have caused, and are likely to continue to cause our sales to decline in such countries. These regulations and policies result in increased costs, lower margins and lower sales than we would otherwise expect, which have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations, or cash flows. Our customers and suppliers may also be affected by these events, so even if we are not directly impacted, we may still experience lower demand for our products and increases in our manufacturing costs because of the effects these events may have on our customers and suppliers. For example, China has implemented a volume based procurement process designed to decrease prices for medical devices and other products. This process has had a negative impact on our revenues in China and we expect it will continue to cause a decrease in the revenue we are able to generate in China. The FDA regulatory clearance process is expensive, time consuming and uncertain, and the failure to obtain and maintain required regulatory clearances and approvals could prevent us from commercializing our products . Before we can introduce a new device or a new use of or a claim for a cleared device in the U.S., we must generally obtain clearance from the FDA, unless an exemption from premarket review or an alternative procedure, such as a de novo risk based classification or a humanitarian device exemption, applies. The FDA clearance and approval processes for medical devices are expensive, uncertain and time consuming. We may make changes to our cleared products without seeking additional clearances or approvals if we determine such clearances or approvals are not necessary and document the basis for that conclusion. However, the FDA may disagree with our determination or may require additional information, including clinical data, to be submitted before a determination is made, in which case we may be required to delay the introduction and marketing of our modified products, redesign our products, conduct clinical trials to support any modifications and pay significant regulatory fines or penalties. In addition, the FDA may not approve or clear our products for the indications that are necessary or desirable for successful commercialization. In particular, w e are currently conducting a large, multinational pivotal human clinical trial of the Wrapsody Endoprosthesis. A successful outcome of this trial is required to obtain approval from the FDA and some international regulatory agencies. However, there is no assurance that we will be able to obtain the necessary regulatory clearances or approvals for the Wrapsody Endoprosthesis or any other products on a timely basis or at all. Further, the FDA may change its clearance and approval policies, adopt additional regulations or revise existing regulations, or take other actions which may prevent or delay approval or clearance of our products under development or impact our ability to modify our currently cleared products on a timely basis. Delays in receipt of, or failure to obtain, regulatory clearances for any product enhancements or new products we develop would result in delayed or no realization of revenue from such product enhancements or new products and in substantial additional costs, which could decrease our profitability. In addition, we are required to continue to comply with applicable FDA and other regulatory requirements once we have obtained clearance or approval for a product. We cannot provide assurance that we will successfully maintain the clearances or approvals we have received or may receive in the future. The loss of previously received clearances or 26 Table of Contents approvals, or the failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements, could also have a material adverse effect on our business. Our products are generally subject to regulatory requirements in foreign countries in which we sell them. We have experienced delays and expended significant resources in obtaining those approvals and clearances and we will likely continue to experience delays and uncertainty, and incur significant expenses, in obtaining those approvals or clearances . In order to sell our products in foreign countries, generally we must obtain regulatory approvals and comply with the regulations of those countries. These regulations, including the requirements for approvals or clearances and the time required for regulatory review, vary from country to country. See our related discussion under Item 1 Business Regulation Regulatory Approvals. In general, we intend to obtain MDR approvals for our principal products sold in the EU ahead of expiry dates; however for multiple reasons, including but not limited to changing business strategies, limited labor pool and contract resources, administrative delays, increased costs of obtaining MDR certification, availability of necessary data and Notified Body capacity, there will be some products that will not be fully compliant at the time of expiry. The additional time and resources required to obtain MDR certification has been a significant factor in, and will likely continue to influence, our decisions to discontinue sales and distribution of certain products in the EU. Complying with and obtaining regulatory approval in foreign countries, including our efforts to comply with the requirements of the MDR, have caused and will likely continue to cause us to experience more uncertainty, risk, expense and delay in commercializing products in certain foreign jurisdictions, which could have a material adverse impact our net sales, market share and operating profits from our international operations. The medical device industry is subject to extensive scrutiny and regulation by governmental authorities and we are currently operating under a Corporate Integrity Agreement. If governmental authorities determine that we have violated laws, regulations or our Corporate Integrity Agreement, our company or our employees may be subject to various penalties, including civil or criminal penalties . Our products and business activities are subject to rigorous regulation by the FDA and other federal, state and foreign governmental authorities. These authorities and domestic and foreign legislators continue to scrutinize the medical device industry. In recent years, the U.S. Congress, DOJ, OIG, SEC and the Department of Defense, as well as foreign counterparts, have issued subpoenas and other requests for information to medical device manufacturers, primarily related to financial arrangements with healthcare providers, regulatory compliance and product promotional practices. In October 2020, we entered into a Settlement Agreement with the DOJ to resolve their investigation into our past marketing transactions and practices. Under the Settlement Agreement and related agreements, we paid $18.7 million (which includes interest and certain fees) in exchange for a release from liability for the alleged conduct. The settlement was also conditi1d upon our entering into the CIA. Please refer to the discussion in Item 1 Business Regulation Corporate Integrity Agreement. Even if we fully comply with the CIA, we have incurred, and anticipate that we will continue to incur, substantial costs in connection with the settlement and compliance with the CIA. It is unclear what impact the settlement has had and may have on our reputation. This matter has consumed a significant amount of our resources and management attention. We anticipate that government authorities will continue to scrutinize our industry closely, and that additional regulation by government authorities may increase compliance costs, exposure to litigation and other adverse effects on our operations. If we fail to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, including the terms of the CIA, we may be subjected to a wide variety of sanctions and enforcement actions, including warning letters that require corrective action, injunctions, product seizures or recalls, suspension of product manufacturing, revocation of approvals, import or export prohibitions, exclusion from participation in government healthcare programs, civil fines and or criminal penalties, which in turn may have a negative impact our business, results of operations, financial condition and ability to obtain financing on reasonable terms. 27 Table of Contents We are subject to laws targeting fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry, the violation of which could adversely affect our business or financial results . Our operations are subject to various state and federal laws targeting fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry, including the federal Anti Kickback Statute and other anti kickback laws, which prohibit any person from knowingly and willfully offering, paying, soliciting or receiving remuneration, directly or indirectly, to induce or reward either the referral of an individual, or the furnishing or arranging for an item or service, for which payment may be made under federal healthcare programs, such as the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Violations of these fraud and abuse related laws are punishable by criminal or civil sanctions, including substantial fines, imprisonment and exclusion from participation in healthcare programs such as Medicare and Medicaid, any of which could harm our business or negatively impact our financial results. Allegations of such violations could lead to expensive and time consuming investigations by government authorities and result in conviction of these violations or settlement costs and additional restrictions, like the CIA discussed above under Item 1 Business Regulation Corporate Integrity Agreement. Furthermore, our contracts with government sponsored healthcare entities are subject to specific procurement requirements. Failure to comply with applicable rules or regulations or with contractual or other requirements may result in m1tary damages and criminal or civil penalties as well as termination of our government contracts or our suspension or debarment from government contract work. Our international operations make us subject to the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and similar anti bribery laws in non U.S. jurisdictions, and our failure, or the failure of our distributors and agents, to comply with these laws could subject us to civil and criminal penalties and adversely affect our business. We currently conduct our business in various foreign countries, and we expect to continue to expand our foreign operations. As a result, we are subject to the FCPA, the U.K. Bribery Act, and similar anti corruption laws in non U.S. jurisdictions. These laws generally prohibit companies and their intermediaries from illegally offering things of value to any individual for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. Compliance with the FCPA and other anti bribery laws presents challenges to our operations. Our policies mandate compliance with the FCPA and all other applicable anti bribery laws. Further, we expect our employees, distributors, agents and others who work for us or on our behalf to comply with these anti bribery laws. Despite our training and compliance programs, our internal control policies and procedures may not always protect us from reckless or criminal acts committed by our employees, distributors or agents. If our employees, distributors or agents violate the provisions of the FCPA or other anti bribery laws, or even if there are allegations of such violations, we could be subject to investigations or civil and criminal penalties or other sanctions, which could have a material, adverse effect on our reputation, business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. Limits on reimbursement imposed by governmental and other programs may adversely affect our business and results of operation. We sell our products to hospitals and other healthcare providers around the world that typically receive reimbursement for the services provided to patients, which incorporate the use of our products, from third party payers such as government programs (e.g., Medicare and Medicaid in the U.S.) and private insurance programs. The ability of our customers to obtain adequate reimbursement for the health care procedures that use our products, such that the cost of our products is covered, is critical to our business. Limits on reimbursement imposed by such third party payers may adversely affect our customers, such as hospitals, physicians and other healthcare providers, to purchase our products, which could adversely affect our business and results of operations. Third party payers, whether foreign or domestic, or governmental or commercial, are developing increasingly sophisticated methods of controlling healthcare costs. In general, a third party payer covers a medical procedure only when the plan administrator is satisfied that the product or procedure is reasonable and necessary to the patient treatment; however, for certain payers (such as foreign governments and some commercial insurers) the cost effectiveness of the treatment may also be a condition. In addition, in the U.S., no uniform policy of coverage and reimbursement for procedures using our products exists among third party payers. Therefore, coverage and reimbursement for procedures using our products can differ significantly from payer to payer and, in some cases, jurisdiction to jurisdiction. In addition, 28 Table of Contents payers continually review new and existing technologies for possible coverage and can, without notice, deny, change or reverse coverage decisions or alter prior authorization requirements for new or existing products and procedures. We cannot provide assurance that we will be successful in any efforts we may potentially undertake to reverse such non coverage or unfavorable coverage decisions. If we are not successful in reversing non coverage or unfavorable coverage policies, or if third party payers that currently cover or reimburse certain procedures involving the use of our products reverse, change or limit their coverage of such procedures in the future, or if other third party payers issue similar policies or adopt similar practices, our business could be adversely impacted. Further, we believe that future coverage and reimbursement may be subject to increased restrictions, such as additional prior authorization requirements, both in the U.S. and in international markets. Third party coverage and reimbursement for procedures using our products or any of our products in development for which we may receive regulatory approval may not be available or adequate in either the U.S. or international markets, which could have an adverse impact on our business. Our business is subject to complex and evolving U.S., state and international laws and regulations regarding privacy and data protection. Many of these laws and regulations are subject to change and uncertain interpretation and could result in claims, changes to our business practices, penalties, increased cost of operations, or declines in user growth or engagement, or otherwise harm our business . The U.S. and many other countries in which we conduct our operations have adopted laws and regulations protecting certain data, including medical and personal data (including HIPAA, the HITECH Act and the rules issued thereunder), and requiring data holders and controllers to implement administrative, logical and technical controls and procedures in order to protect the privacy of such data. Individual states have also begun to enact data privacy laws. For example, California Consumer Protection Act went into effect on January 1, 2020, giving consumers the right to demand certain information and actions from companies who collect personal information. Internationally, some countries have also passed laws and regulations that require individually identifiable data on their citizens to be maintained on local servers and that may restrict transfer or processing of that data. In addition, regulatory authorities around the world are considering a number of additional proposals concerning data protection. These laws and regulations have been, and may continue to be, inconsistent with each other, requiring different approaches in different jurisdictions. In addition, the interpretation and application of medical and personal data protection laws and regulations in the U.S., Europe, China and elsewhere are often uncertain and in flux. Further, we have incurred, and will likely continue to incur, significant expense in connection with our efforts to comply with those applicable laws and regulations. It is possible that these laws and regulations may be interpreted and applied in a manner that is inconsistent with our data practices, possibly resulting in fines or orders requiring that we change our data practices, which could have an adverse effect on our business and results of operations. Complying with these various laws could cause us to incur substantial costs or require us to change our business practices in a manner adverse to our business. Legal developments in foreign countries have created compliance uncertainty regarding certain transfers of personal data from certain countries to the U.S. or other foreign countries. For example, the GDPR, applies to the processing of personal data related to the activities of an establishment in the EU or to the processing of personal data of data subjects who are in the EU where this is related to products and services that we offer to EU users. The GDPR created a range of new compliance obligations, which could cause us to change our business practices, and significantly increases financial penalties for noncompliance (including possible fines of up to 4% of the total worldwide global annual turnover for the preceding financial year or 20 million (whichever is higher) for the most serious infringements). In addition, as discussed under Item 1 Business Regulation Privacy and Security, the PIPL, similar to the GDPR, applies to personal information processing activities outside of China if companies provide products or services to individuals in China or analyze and evaluate the behavior of individuals in China. If we fail to comply with the requirements of the PIPL, we could incur severe penalties, including a fine of up to RMB 50 million or 5% of our annual turnover in the preceding year and revocation of our license to do business in China. If we incur any of these penalties in the EU or China for violations of the GDPR or PIPL, our business and operations in those areas could be adversely affected and have a material adverse effect on our financial results. 29 Table of Contents Our failure to comply with applicable environmental, health and safety laws and regulations could affect our business, operations or financial condition. We manufacture and assemble certain products that require the use of hazardous materials that are subject to various national, federal, state and local laws and regulations governing the protection of the environment, health and safety. Moreover, climate change and sustainability efforts and potential climate change regulations could lead to business interruption, significantly increased costs and other adverse consequences to our business. While the cost of compliance with such laws and regulations has not had a material adverse effect on our results of operations historically, compliance with future regulations may require additional capital investments or other expenses. Additionally, because we use a limited amount of hazardous and other regulated materials in our manufacturing processes, we are subject to certain risks of future liabilities, lawsuits and claims resulting from any substances we manufacture, dispose of or release. Certain environmental laws and regulations may impose strict liability for the conduct of, or conditions caused by, others, or for acts that were in non compliance with all applicable laws at the time the acts were performed, rendering us liable without regard to our negligence or fault. Because of these laws, any accidental release may have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Our operations are also subject to various laws and regulations relating to occupational health and safety. We maintain safety, training and maintenance programs as part of our ongoing efforts to ensure compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Compliance with applicable health and safety laws and regulations has required and continues to require significant expenditures. We are also subject to corporate social responsibility, or CSR, laws and regulations which require us to monitor the labor standards in our supply chain, including the California Transparency in Supply Chains Act, the UK Modern Slavery Act, and U.S. Federal Acquisition Regulations regarding Combating Trafficking in Persons. These CSR labor laws and regulations may impose additional processes and supplier management systems and have led certain key customers to impose additional requirements on medical device companies, including audits, as a prerequisite to selling products to such customers, which could result in increased costs for our products, the termination or suspension of certain suppliers, and reductions in our margins and profitability. Use of our products in unapproved circumstances could expose us to liabilities . The marketing clearances and approvals from the FDA and other regulators of certain of our products are, or are expected to be, limited to specific uses. We are prohibited from marketing or promoting any uncleared or unapproved use of our product. However, physicians may use these products in ways or circumstances other than those strictly within the scope of the regulatory approval or clearance. The use of our products for unauthorized purposes could arise from our sales personnel or distributors violating our policies by providing information or recommendations about such unauthorized uses. Consequently, claims may be asserted by the FDA or other enforcement agencies that we are not in compliance with applicable laws or regulations or have improperly promoted our products for uncleared or unapproved uses. The FDA or such other agencies could require a recall of products or allege that our promotional activities misbrand or adulterate our products or violate other legal requirements, which could result in investigations, prosecutions, fines or other civil or criminal actions. Our products may be subject to product liability claims and warranty claims . Our products are used in connection with invasive procedures and in other medical contexts that entail an inherent risk of product liability claims. If medical personnel or their patients suffer injury or death in connection with the use of our products, whether as a result of a failure of our products to function as designed, an inappropriate design, inadequate disclosure of product related risks or information, improper use, or for any other reason, we could be subject to lawsuits seeking significant compensatory and punitive damages. Product liability claims may be brought by individuals or by groups seeking to represent a class. We have previously faced, and currently face, claims by patients claiming injuries from our products. To date, these claims have not resulted in material harm to our operations or financial condition. The outcome of this type of personal injury litigation is difficult to assess or quantify. We maintain product liability insurance; however, there is no assurance that this coverage will be sufficient to satisfy any claim made against us. Moreover, any product liability claim brought against us could result in significant costs, divert our management attention from other business matters or operations, increase our product liability insurance rates, or prevent us from securing insurance 30 Table of Contents coverage in the future. As a result, any lawsuit seeking significant m1tary damages may have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We generally offer a limited warranty for the return of product due to defects in quality and workmanship. We attempt to estimate our potential liability for future product returns and establish reserves on our financial statements in amounts that we believe will be sufficient to address our warranty obligations; however, our actual liability for product returns may significantly exceed the amount of our reserves. If we underestimate our potential liability for future product returns, or if unanticipated events result in returns that exceed our historical experience, our financial condition and operating results could be materially harmed. In addition, the occurrence of such an event or claim could result in a recall of products from the market or a safety alert relating to such products. Such a recall could result in significant costs, reduce our revenue, divert management attention from our business, and harm our reputation. Our products may cause or contribute to adverse medical events that we are required to report to the FDA or other governmental authorities, and if we fail to do so, we may be subject to sanctions that may materially harm our business . Our products are subject to medical device reporting regulations, which require us to report to the FDA information that reasonably suggests 1 of our products may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or 1 of our products malfuncti1d and, if the malfunction were to recur, this device or a similar device that we market would be likely to cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. Our obligation to report under the medical device reporting regulations is triggered on the date on which we become aware of information that reasonably suggests a reportable adverse event occurred. We may fail to report adverse events of which we become aware within the prescribed timeframe. We may also fail to recognize that we have become aware of a reportable adverse event, especially if it is not reported to us as an adverse event or if it is an adverse event that is unexpected or if the product characteristic that caused the adverse event is removed in time from our products. Inspections by the FDA or other regulators may reveal violations or instances of noncompliance under the QSRs and other post market requirements. If we fail to comply with our medical device reporting obligations or commit a violation of these requirements, the FDA could issue warning letters or untitled letters, take administrative actions, commence criminal prosecution, impose civil m1tary penalties, demand or initiate a product recall, seize our products, or delay the clearance of our future products. Other regulatory authorities could take similar actions within their jurisdictions. Our employees, independent contractors, consultants, manufacturers and distributors may engage in misconduct or other improper activities, including noncompliance with regulatory standards and requirements. We are exposed to the risk that our employees, independent contractors, consultants, manufacturers and distributors may engage in fraudulent conduct or other illegal activity. Misconduct by these parties could include intentional, reckless or negligent conduct, or unauthorized activities that violate the healthcare laws and regulations of the FDA and other federal, state and international authorities, manufacturing standards, and laws that require the true, complete and accurate reporting of financial information or data. We have adopted a code of business conduct and ethics, and a global anti corruption policy, but it is not always possible to identify and deter misconduct, and the precautions we take to detect and prevent this activity may not be effective in controlling unknown or unmanaged risks or losses or in protecting us from governmental investigations or other actions or lawsuits stemming from a failure to be in compliance with such laws or regulations. If any such actions are instituted against us, and we are not successful in defending ourselves or asserting our rights, those actions could have a significant impact on our business, including the imposition of significant civil, criminal and administrative penalties. We may be a party to litigation in the course of our business or otherwise, which could affect our financial condition and results of operations . We are routinely a party to or otherwise involved in legal proceedings, claims or other legal matters, arising in the course of our business. In particular, our company, our Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer have been named in a complaint filed in the U.S. District Court for the Central District of California, which alleges violations of certain federal securities laws, and our company and certain of our officers and directors have been named in a related shareholder derivative proceeding filed in the U.S. District Court of the State of Utah. Legal proceedings can be complex and take 31 Table of Contents many months, or even years, to reach resolution, with the final outcome depending on a number of variables, some of which are not within our control. Litigation is subject to significant uncertainty and may be expensive, time consuming, and disruptive to our operations. Although it is our intention to vigorously defend ourselves in such legal proceedings, their ultimate resolution and potential financial and other impacts on us are uncertain. If a legal proceeding is resolved against us, it could result in significant compensatory damages or injunctive relief that could materially adversely affect our financial condition, results of operations and cash flows. Intellectual Property We may not be able to effectively protect our intellectual property, which could harm our business and financial condition . Our ability to remain competitive is dependent, in part, upon our ability to protect our intellectual property rights and prevent other companies from infringing our intellectual property rights to produce competing products. We seek to protect our intellectual property rights through a combination of confidentiality and license agreements, maintaining certain trade secrets, and through registrations under patent, trademark, and copyright laws. However, these measures afford only limited protection and may be challenged, invalidated, or circumvented by third parties. Additionally, these measures may not prevent competitors from duplicating our products or gaining access to our proprietary information and technology. Third parties may copy all or portions of our products or otherwise use our intellectual property without authorization, and we may not be able to prevent the unauthorized disclosure or use of our intellectual property by consultants, vendors, former employees and current employees. Despite our efforts to restrict such unauthorized disclosure or use through nondisclosure agreements and other contractual restrictions, we may not be able to enforce these contractual provisions or we may incur substantial costs enforcing our legal rights. Third parties may also develop similar or superior technology independently or by designing around our patents. In addition, the laws of some foreign countries do not offer the same level of protection for our intellectual property as the laws of the U.S. Further, no assurances can be given that any patent application we have filed or will file will result in a patent being issued, or that any existing or future patents will afford adequate or meaningful protection against competitors or against similar technologies. All of our patents and copyrights will eventually expire and some of our patents, including patents protecting significant elements of our technology, will expire within the next several years. Filing, prosecuting and defending our intellectual property in countries throughout the world may be impractical and prohibitively expensive. Litigation may be necessary in the future to enforce our intellectual property rights, protect our trade secrets or to determine the validity and scope of proprietary rights claimed by others. Any such lawsuits that we might initiate could be expensive, take significant time and divert management attention from our business. Litigation also puts our patents at risk of being invalidated or interpreted narrowly. Additionally, we may provoke third parties to assert claims against us. Moreover, the legal systems of certain countries, particularly certain developing countries, do not favor the aggressive enforcement of patents and other intellectual property protections, which makes it difficult to stop infringement. We may not prevail in any lawsuits that we initiate, and the damages or other remedies awarded, if any, may not be commercially valuable. Third parties claiming that we infringe their intellectual property rights could cause us to incur significant legal or licensing expenses and prevent us from selling our products . Our commercial success will depend in part on not infringing or violating the intellectual property rights of others. From time to time, third parties may claim that we have infringed their intellectual property rights, including claims regarding patents, copyrights, trademarks, trade secrets, and confidential information. We may not be aware of whether our products do or will infringe existing or future patents or the intellectual property rights of others. Because of constant technological change in the medical device industry in which we compete, the extensive patent coverage of existing technologies, and the rapid rate of issuance of new patents, it is possible that the number of these claims may grow. In addition, former employers of our former, current, or future employees may assert claims that such employees have improperly disclosed to us the confidential or proprietary information of such former employers. Any such claim, with or without merit, could result in costly litigation, distract management from day to day operations and harm our brand or reputation, which in turn could harm our business or results of operations. If we are not successful in defending such claims, we could be required to (i) stop selling our products, (ii) redesign our products, (iii) discontinue the use of related trademarks, technologies or 32 Table of Contents designs, (iv) pay damages or indemnification obligations, or (v) enter into royalty or licensing arrangements. Royalty or licensing arrangements that we may seek in such circumstances may not be available to us on commercially reasonable terms or at all and we may not be able to redesign applicable products in a way to avoid infringing the intellectual property rights of others. We have made and expect to continue making significant expenditures to investigate, defend and settle claims related to the use of technology and intellectual property rights as part of our strategy to manage this risk. Information Technology and Cybersecurity Risks We rely on the proper function, availability and security of information technology systems to operate our business, and a material disruption of critical information systems or a material breach in the security of our systems may adversely affect our business and customer relationships . We rely on information technology systems (including technology from third party providers) to process, transmit, and store electronic information in our day to day operations, including sensitive personal information and proprietary or confidential information. We also rely on our technology infrastructure, among other functions, to interact with customers and suppliers, fulfill orders and bill, collect and make payments, ship products, provide support to customers, fulfill contractual obligations and otherwise conduct business. Our internal information technology systems, as well as those systems maintained by third party providers, may be subjected to computer viruses or other malicious code, unauthorized access attempts, and cyber attacks, any of which could result in data leaks or otherwise compromise our confidential or proprietary information and disrupt our operations. Cyber attacks are becoming more sophisticated and frequent, and there can be no assurance that our protective measures have prevented or will prevent security breaches, any of which could have a significant impact on our business, reputation and financial condition, particularly attacks that result in our intellectual property and other confidential information being accessed or stolen. We rely on third party vendors to supply and support certain aspects of our information technology systems. These third party systems could also become vulnerable to cyber attacks, malicious intrusions, breakdowns, interference or other significant disruptions, and may contain defects in design or manufacture or other problems that could result in system disruption or compromise the information security of our own systems. In addition, we continue to grow in part through business and product acquisitions and, as a result, may face risks associated with defects and vulnerabilities in the systems operated by the other parties to those transactions, or difficulties or other breakdowns or disruptions in connection with the integration of the acquired businesses and products into our information technology systems. Cyber attacks could also result in unauthorized access to our systems and products, including personal information of individuals, which could trigger notification requirements, encourage actions by regulatory bodies, result in adverse publicity, prompt us to offer credit support products or services to affected individuals and lead to class action or other civil litigation. If we fail to monitor, maintain or protect our information technology systems and data integrity effectively or fail to anticipate, plan for or manage significant disruptions to these systems, we could (i) lose customers, (ii) be subject to fraud, (iii) breach our agreements with or duties toward customers, physicians, other health care professionals and employees, (iv) be subject to regulatory sanctions or penalties, (v) incur expenses or lose revenues, (vi) sustain damage to our reputation, or (vii) suffer other adverse consequences. Unauthorized tampering, adulteration or interference with our products may also create issues with product functionality that could result in a loss of data, risk to patient safety, and product recalls or field actions. Any of these events could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Market, Liquidity and Credit Risks The agreements and instruments governing our debt contain restrictions and limitations that could significantly affect our ability to operate our business, as well as significantly affect our liquidity . On July 31, 2019 we entered into a Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement ( Third Amended Credit Agreement ), with Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as administrative agent and a lender, and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, BOFA Securities, Inc., HSBC Bank USA, National Association, and U.S. Bank National Association as joint lead arrangers and joint bookrunners, and Bank of America, N.A., HSBC Bank USA, National Association and U.S. Bank National Association as co syndication agents. In addition, Bank of America, N.A., HSBC Bank USA, National Association, U.S. Bank, National Association, BMO Harris Bank, N.A., and MUFG Union Bank, Ltd. are parties to the 33 Table of Contents Third Amended Credit Agreement as lenders. The Third Amended Credit Agreement amends and restates in its entirety our previously outstanding Second Amended and Restated Credit Agreement and all amendments thereto (the Second Amended Credit Agreement ). The Third Amended Credit Agreement contains a number of significant covenants that could adversely affect our ability to operate our business, our liquidity or our results of operations. These covenants restrict, among other things, our incurrence of indebtedness, creation of liens or pledges on our assets, mergers or similar combinations or liquidations, asset dispositions, repurchases or redemptions of equity interests or debt, issuances of equity, payment of dividends and certain distributions and entry into related party transactions. We have pledged substantially all of our assets as collateral for the Third Amended Credit Agreement. Our breach of any covenant in the Third Amended Credit Agreement, not otherwise cured, waived or amended, could result in a default under that agreement and could trigger acceleration of the underlying obligations. Any default under the Third Amended Credit Agreement could adversely affect our ability to service our debt and to fund our planned capital expenditures and ongoing operations. The administrative agent, joint lead arrangers, joint bookrunners and lenders under the Third Amended Credit Agreement have available to them the remedies typically available to lenders and secured parties, including the ability to foreclose on the collateral we have pledged. It could lead to an acceleration of indebtedness and foreclosure on our assets. As currently amended, the Third Amended Credit Agreement provides for potential borrowings of up to $750 million. Such increased borrowing limits may make it more difficult for us to comply with leverage ratios and other restrictive covenants in the Third Amended Credit Agreement. We may also have less cash available for operations and investments in our business, as we will be required to use additional cash to satisfy the minimum payment obligations associated with this increased indebtedness. We depend on generating sufficient cash flow to fund our debt obligations, capital expenditures, and ongoing operations. We are dependent on our cash on hand and free cash flow to fund our debt obligations, capital expenditures and ongoing operations. Our ability to service our debt and to fund our planned capital expenditures and ongoing operations will depend on our ability to continue to generate cash flow. If we are unable to generate sufficient cash flow or we are unable to access additional liquidity sources, we may not be able to service or repay our debt, operate our business, respond to competitive challenges, or fund our other liquidity and capital needs. The market price of our common stock has been and may continue to be volatile. The market price of our common stock has recently been, and may in the future be, volatile for various reasons, including those discussed in these risk factors. Other events that could cause volatility in our stock include, without limitation, variances in our financial results; analysts and other projections or recommendations regarding our common stock specifically or medical technology stocks generally; any restatement of our financial statements or any investigation of us by the SEC, DOJ, OIG, FDA, or another regulatory authority; actions taken by activist investors or other shareholders, significant litigation or a decline, or rise, of stock prices in capital markets generally. Fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates may negatively impact our financial results. As our operations have grown outside the U.S., we have also become increasingly subject to market risk relating to foreign currency. Those fluctuations could have a negative impact on our margins and financial results. During 2021, 2020 and 2019, the exchange rate between all applicable foreign currencies and the U.S. Dollar resulted in an increase in net sales of $10.3 million, a decrease in net sales of $13 million and a decrease in net sales of $135 million, respectively. For the year ended December 31, 2021, $370.0 million, or 34.4%, of our net sales were denominated in foreign currencies, with our CNY and Euro denominated sales representing our largest currency risks to net sales. If the rate of exchange between foreign currencies declines against the U.S. Dollar, we may not be able to increase the prices we charge our customers for products whose prices are denominated in those respective foreign currencies. Furthermore, we may be unable or elect not to enter into hedging transactions which could mitigate the effect of declining exchange rates. As a result, if the rate of exchange between foreign currencies declines against the U.S. Dollar, our financial results may be negatively impacted. 34 Table of Contents Fluctuations in our effective tax rate may adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operation. We are subject to taxation in numerous countries, states and other jurisdictions. Our effective tax rate is derived from a combination of applicable tax rates in the various countries, states and other jurisdictions in which we operate. In preparing our financial statements, we estimate the amount of tax that will become payable in each of these jurisdictions. Our effective tax rate may, however, differ from the estimated amount due to numerous factors, including a change in the mix of our profitability from country to country and changes in tax laws. Any of these factors could cause us to experience an effective tax rate significantly different from previous periods or our current expectations, which could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operation. Uncertainty relating to the LIBOR calculation method and potential phasing out of LIBOR after 2021 may adversely affect the interest rates under our Third Amended Credit Agreement . Certain of the interest rates applicable to our Third Amended Credit Agreement, and applicable to hedging instruments we have purchased to offset interest rate risk under our Third Amended Credit Agreement, are LIBOR based. On July 27, 2017, the U.K. Financial Conduct Authority (the FCA ) announced that it will no longer persuade or compel banks to submit rates for the calculation of LIBOR rates after 2021 Actions by the FCA, other regulators or law enforcement agencies may result in changes to the method by which LIBOR is calculated. At this time, it is not possible to predict the effect of any such changes or any other reforms to LIBOR that may be enacted in the UK or elsewhere. Uncertainty as to the nature of such potential changes may adversely affect the trading market for LIBOR based securities, including the floating rates applicable to our Third Amended Credit Agreement and related hedges. It is possible that the changes in how LIBOR is calculated, changes in the trading market for LIBOR based securities or actions of the FCA and other government entities may cause unexpected increases in LIBOR rates or a breakdown in the LIBOR systems. If these issues arise, we could experience increased interest rates or uncertainty with respect to the calculation of interest on our Third Amended Credit Agreement and other instruments, which could harm our operations. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments. N1 Item 2 Item 2 Properties.
